Title
Review for Prince of Egypt, The (1998)
Number of Reviews
29

Author
Mark R. Leeper
     Back in the 1950s and 1960s Biblical films were again a big
business like they had not been since the days of silent film.  Cecil
B. DeMille opened the way with his remake of his own THE TEN
COMMANDMENTS (1956).  BEN HUR (1959) followed, and while not a story
directly from the Bible itself, it did involve Biblical incidents.  It
was also a remake of a 1920s film.  Eventually the times changed and
the popularity of Biblical films died.  The last major Biblical films
released to theaters were KING DAVID (1985) and THE LAST TEMPTATION OF
CHRIST (1988).  There have been some made-for-TV experiments, since but
THE PRINCE OF EGYPT from Dreamworks is the first major Biblical film
released to theaters in a decade.  In many ways it is THE TEN
COMMANDMENTS for a new generation and it repeatedly invites comparison.
Ironically the new version may create as much interest in the art and
culture of ancient Egypt as it creates for the Bible.
     THE PRINCE OF EGYPT begins with a statement that the story that
follows is true to the essence and values of the original story.  That
may be true but the film is somewhat truer to the plot of THE TEN
COMMANDMENTS than it is to any story told in the Bible.  DeMille based
his story on three novels about Moses as much as he did on the Bible.
The Bible does not make the young Moses an important person in
Pharaoh's household.  In Exodus the story is told with terse economy.
It merely says he was raised as the son of Pharaoh's daughter and later
that a slave called him "a prince."  And do not over-rate the value of
being a prince of Egypt, there were dozens.  Rameses the Great, who by
the way is generally considered to be the Pharaoh with whom Moses
bargained, had over 100 children.  His father might well have had
equally many and probably would have had little interest in the Hebrew
child one of his many daughters had adopted.  It makes for a better
story to say that Moses nearly became a Pharaoh himself, but that is
not what the Bible says.
     The story of THE PRINCE OF EGYPT will be familiar to many in the
audience, though somewhat more if they are familiar with the 1956 film
than is they know the Bible story.  The Israelites were slaves to a
Pharaoh in Egypt who was afraid that even as slaves they were becoming
too numerous and soon would become too powerful.  Pharaoh decrees that
all the male children of the Israelites are to be slain.  This brings
us to the opening of the film where Yocheved (voiced by Ofra Haza) sets
her newborn son adrift on the Nile in a reed basket, weighing a great
danger against a more certain death.  The boy is adopted by Pharaoh's
wife (not daughter as the Bible says) and becomes like a second son to
the Pharaoh.  In the most interesting variation on the DeMille version
Rameses (Ralph Fiennes) loves Moses (Val Kilmer).  Moses loves Rameses
too until he finds that he, Moses, is really a Hebrew.  So rather than
being a one-dimensional villain, there is some depth to Rameses.  Moses
kills an Egyptian taskmaster and flees Egypt.  While Rameses misses his
friend, Moses is called on by God (also voiced by Val Kilmer) to return
to Egypt and free his people, setting up the classic conflict.
     In animation, virtually anything that the mind's eye can see can
be put on the screen, and THE PRINCE OF EGYPT wastes no opportunity to
outdo DeMille's spectacle.  The Egyptian architecture as it appears
here is positively titanic.  The whole film seems to show architecture
of the same scale that was used to cow the locals at Abu Simbel.
Egyptian architecture is impressive, but here it is portrayed with a
certain hyperbole.  The buildings and statues as shown here are
enormous and their size is frequently exaggerated with overhead views.
     The style of Egyptian wall decoration is to show important figures
as being larger than other figures in a scene.  A variation on that is
used by the Dreamworks animators.  The most important characters are
given a realistic three-dimensional look.  Lessor characters are
animated in a flatter style.  That effect could have made the animation
look wildly uneven.  But the animators at Dreamworks make it all work
quite well.  In addition some of the important sequences look in part
or all almost photographic.  Some of the most effective scenes however
are done entirely flat as the story of what led to the opening of the
film is shown as animated wall decoration.  This sequence rivals the
parting of the Red Sea as the most imaginative in the film.
     In the DeMille telling there is an emotional climax to the story
and a visual climax.  The visual climax is the parting of the Red Sea.
Using the best visual methods available in the 1950s, DeMille used a
patchwork of mattes of scenes of flowing water.  The methods were
imperfect and little more convincing than using two rounded cakes of
Jell-O as DeMille did in the silent version. Computer animation gives a
filmmaker much more freedom and also more responsibility to do
something spectacular.  And spectacular is what they manage.  Where
this version falls flat is mishandling of the emotional climax of the
story.  After the night of terror and death comes the morning of
Freedom.  DeMille managed to give it a tremendous impact that remains
exciting even after many viewings.  A big piece of the credit goes to
Elmer Bernstein's music. THE PRINCE OF EGYPT understates the departure
almost disastrously with the Hebrews just quietly picking up and moving
out to the music of a song.  Time will tell if I am wrong, but all the
songs by Steven Schwartz seemed immediately forgettable.
     As with ANTZ a host of familiar actors were used to voice parts.
In this case Val Kilmer, Ralph Fiennes, Michelle Pfeiffer, Sandra
Bullock, Jeff Goldblum, Danny Glover, Patrick Stewart, Helen Mirren,
Steve Martin, and Martin Short.  To my ear only Goldblum and Stewart
have voices characteristic enough to pick out.  Both Moses and God are
voiced by Val Kilmer, so it was almost a mercy that I did not recognize
his voice.  In general animation does not require big stars to do the
voices, and it almost seems wasteful.
     THE PRINCE OF EGYPT tells the story of the Exodus for a new
generation and does it in spectacular style.  I give it a 7 on the 0 to
10 scale and a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Author
Tim Voon
Voices: Val Kilmer, Ralph Fiennes, Michelle Pfeiffer, Sandra Bullock,
Jeff Goldblum, Patrick Stewart, Steve Martin, Martin Short.
Screenplay: Philip LaZebnik.
Directors: Brenda Chapman, Steve Hickner and Simon Wells
    A dramatic, full motion, animation epic is always a bit risky, and
will bring, a couple of sniggers from the mouth's of audiences who are
unaccustomed to the likes. So it is not surprising that The Prince of
Egypt, runs a difficult and lonely race against the dominating likes of
cute Disney animation flicks. But the fact it dares to be different pays
off, and those familiar with the story of Moses and the word Exodus,
will not be alienated by the plot, because it does not stray very far
from what is actually recorded in the Bible.
      There are odd moments of humour thrown in amidst the drama, but
these are so off beat that one is unsure whether to laugh or not. An
example is Moses post-sandstorm - a scene more reminiscent of a
Roadrunner cartoon. Besides these slight hiccups, the heavy score
composed by Hans Zimmer and Stephen Shwartz is well suited to the grand
scale of the story. And the special effects are bigger, better and
badder than the Cecil B. DeMille version of the same story, The Ten
Commandments. Of particular note are the burning bush and the parting of
the Red Sea. In fact, the parting of the sea, can be more accurately
described as the parting of an ocean  take my word, there's a lot of
water!
     As for the cast, Ralph Fiennes' wonderful accent lends Pharoah a
kind of British air that would have been missing from the original, but
is otherwise in character. Val Kilmer loans more of a humble tone to the
modest, troubled Moses. Michelle Pfeiffer sings well as Tzipporah, watch
for her part in the movie, which is sung by Mariah Carey in the hit
single We Believe. You will also recognise many other famous names in
the other lead roles, but in particular Steve Martin and Martin Short
lend their talents to one of the few, in synch, humorous parts of the
movie as the high priests, Hotep and Huy. Overall this is an immense
achievement from Dreamworks who have worked hard to develop an animation
epic that is worth watching.

Author
Matt Williams
When Dreamworks first set up an animation division to rival Disney, it
was a lofty goal.  And their first traditionally animated film, The
Prince of Egypt, makes some bold steps.  Telling the tale of Moses, the
film eschews Disney's traditionally comedic kid-friendly approach to
animation, in favor of a more serious, more adult style of animation.
Their experiment is a success.  While not a perfect film, its rich
visuals join with a strong storyline to create a true animated epic.
Fearing a population explosion, the Egyptian Pharaoh Seti (Patrick
Stewart) orders the murder of all Hebrew babies.  One Hebrew mother
(Ofra Haza) places her baby in a reed basket, and floats him down the
Nile to avoid his fate. Miraculously, the child ends up in the royal
palace, where the queen (Helen Mirren) adopts him and raises the baby
Moses as her own son.
Flash forward several years.  Prince Moses (Val Kilmer) and his elder
brother Prince Ramses (Ralph Fiennes) are a pair of royal
troublecausers.  They're particularly annoying to the royal priests,
Hotep and Huy (Steve Martin and Martin Short). However, Ramses, the
future Pharaoh, is also constantly worried about living up to the high
expectations set by his father.  Moses, on the other hand, is unaware of
his true identity, until a chance encounter with his real brother and
sister (Jeff Goldblum and Sandra Bullock), that is.
The brotherly conflict continues through adulthood, when each prince
takes a different path.  Ramses takes the throne and tries to expand and
surpass his father's empire.  Moses abandons his adopted family, and
instead opts for the life of a simple shepherd, and marriage to the
feisty Tzipporah (Michelle Pfieffer). But God has another destiny in
mind for Moses...one which will put him at odds with his former brother,
but which may finally grant freedom to the suffering Hebrew slaves.
With it's star studded cast, The Prince of Egypt suffers from the same
spot-the-star syndrome of Dreamworks' previous animated film, Antz.
Rather than blending seamlessly into the characters, the celebrity
voices leap to the forefront of your consciousness every time someone
speaks. (It's particularly distracting when The Voice Of God issues
forth, and, rather than being awe-struck, you're thinking, "Hey, isn't
that Val Kilmer...".)
The animation of The Prince of Egypt is nothing short of spectacular.
The special effects are appropriately awe-inspiring, but the film excels
at character detail as well.  If you're an animation enthusiast, the
quality here alone makes this film a must-see.
However, good animation aside, The Prince of Egypt can never quite shake
the mediciney feeling that this is animation which is supposed to be
"good-for-you"...both spiritually and visually. The film flows best when
it simply relaxes and lets the story unfold. However, there is a stiff
formality that hangs over several scenes of the movie.  It feels like
everyone involved tensed up at the same moment when they realized they
were doing something "important", and that translated on screen.
The Prince of Egypt has a big story to tell, and only 100 minutes in
which to tell it.  As a result, the story feels awfully rushed. Some
events are glossed over in montages, others (particularly the events
after the Red Sea) are mostly ignored.
Young children might get confused or frightened during some of the
film's more intense scenes (the plagues, for example).  But, for the
most part, the film is structured simply enough that kids should be able
to follow the story.  And though comic relief isn't stressed nearly as
highly as the standard Disney fare, there are some good humorous bits
here and there.
The flaws of The Prince of Egypt could be summed up by saying Dreamworks
was trying too hard.  The result is thoroughly watchable, and, at times,
technically brilliant, but a little stiff, awkward and rushed in places.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Author
Knut Brockmann
USA 1998    Running Time: 97 minutes approx.
Directed by: Brenda Chapman, Steve Hickner, Siman Wells
        Right at the beginning we are reminded: This film modifies the
narration of the Bible in some aspects. But the creators put themselves
under the task to treat the story carefully and to show respect, not
only for this paticular religion, but for any religion. Was "Prince of
Egypt" going to be another one of those picuters which use just the
elements of the given story that are appropriate for children in order
to tell a typical all-age-appeal fairy tale? With a certain shudder I
thought back to Disney´s "Pocahontas" which twisted any historical fact
to provide an ordinary love story painted in black and white.
Fortunately, 'Dreamworks-Animation' taught me better: Their first
animated feature presents itself as a mature epic filled with
interesting characters and striking images. A new kind of animation
movie is born.
        The story focuses on the character of Moses, who grows up as the
'Prince of Egypt', though he is actually the son of a hebrew slave. By
the time he becomes concious about his true origin and so he decides to
leave his supposed family. In the desert he has an encounter with God,
who sends him back to egypt as his pawn to free the hebrewn people and
with that to face his --still beloved-- brother Ramses. This tale, with
which every inhabitant of the western hemisphere should, at least in
fragments, be familiar, contains every big emotion --from love to hate--
and many opportunities to present great images, even miracles. This is
the stuff for a traditional vintage epic and it is widely used by the
Draemworks staff. Rarely one has experienced such an overwhelming flood
of breathtaking images in an animated feature. They can be compared in
power to epics such as David Lean´s "Lawrence of Arabia" or Cecel B.
DeMille´s "The Ten Commandments". Thematically it is very close to the
latter. To emulate the style of these named examples and to
simultanously distinguish the film from the common animation movies the
animators used various techniques which were never used before. Whereas
in former times the facial play was limited to the eyes, the eyebrows
and the mouth, Dreamworks presents a more detailed body language here.
Not only the walk and the posture depend on the mood of the character,
the mimic includes also the eyelids, the shaping of the head, and the
cheaks. By that they come very close to real actors. Even small nuances
and changes in the mood can be transmitted that way. Corresponding to
this the characters are also developed more richly. Moses appears as a
dialectical figure who is torn between two essentially different worlds.
He does NOT enjoy the god-given power. Instead he wishes to escape from
his leadership and he wants the changes in his life to be reversed. He
is arkin to an acient greek tragic hero who --though he is trying very--
cannot escape his destiny. His brother Ramses is not presented as a
common villain. He an ambivalent person whose motivations are perfectly
understandable. To him, Moses´ behaviour seems weird. He cannot
understand why his brother wants to lead slaves to freedom, since he
regards them as property. In his education as an heir, he was prepared
to use slaves as an instrument to expand his empire. He was taught that
as a king it is his duty to spread his people and to execute his power,
no matter how gruesome and cruel he has to proceed. Fear is an
intsrument, his father has shown it to him. Still the old Pharao was a
kind man. He loved his children and his people. By the time God
oppresses Ramses by murdering his son the Pharao´s anger can understood.
He projects this act of violence onto his brother Moses and chases him
with his army. Revenge and hate emerge from the situation not from an
one-dimensional characterization. The most negative influence on the
persons has God himself, bad-tempered and in thirst for revenge he shows
himself from his brutal side. He goes for the innocent children like the
rulers then did it to the hebrews. He even surpasses them in cruelty by
destroying the bondage between Moses and Ramses and by terminating more
lives than the Pharaos did.
        Not only through the characterizations, also through the supporting
"cast" and the almost entirely serious mood, the picture creates a grim
and rich atmosphere which makes it appear mature throughout. It is
highly innovative, especially during the numerous highlights like the
Moses´ dream, which transforms the two-dimensional drawings of the
ancient egypt into an astonishing, surrealistic and three-dimensional
experience. Also the attempt to create a symbiosis through a permanent
integration of CGI´s into traditionally generated images has a
harmonizing effect as it prevents suddenly necessary CGI´s from being to
noticeable. This leads to a visual fluency which is not even interrupted
by the final division of the Red Sea.
        Unfortunatly this innovation is corrupted by the clumsy attempt to
include songs. While the musical prologue seems appropriate, there is a
sequence which is obviously borrowed from Disney: Here the priest, who
appeared rather serious up to that point, sing that Moses should look at
the "professionals" (vocabulary of the german version), after he tried
to impress Ramses with a first miracle. Even "Lion King´s" 
elevator-song "Hakuna Matata" would have been more suitable. This
anachronisism nearly destroys the whole atmosphere by attempting to keep
the kids as an audience. The other songs, mostly used as time-lapse or
to transport the thoughts of the protagonists, fit better, at least they
are no distraction. The score by Hans Zimmer, with his choires and his
seas of strings, does justice to this sweeping animated epic.
        All this leads to a film which easily achieves its very ambitious goals
but, in its bold and honourable endevour to be mature, sacrifices most
of the audience, which may prefer to be entertained by the classic,
vintage Disney tricks. Still I would be glad if I was wrong. Though the
head of the Dreamworks Animation Company is a former Disney man, one can
by no means compare "Prince of Egypt" with a Disney feature. He chooses
a totally different angle by attempting to produce large scale epic,
which is animated for variety (and maybe also for budget reasons). In
the case of a success this would open the door for new possibilities in
the genre of animation movies. All I can do right now is recommend this
unique achievement. A fantastic movie, not only among animated ones.
Translated from german to english by Knut Brockmann, Ralf Behet and
Christian Behet
Since we are no native speakers there might be a few expressions in this
review which may sound clumsy. We would like to apologize in advance.
E- Mail: Knut.Brockmann@darmstadt.netsurf.de
Die Filmpage des Knut B.: http://surf.to/filmpage/
Neues Special im Anmarsch: Der Soldat James Ryan: Eine Analyse

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director:   Brenda Chapman, Steve Hickner, Simon Wells
Cast:  Val Kilmer, Ralph Fiennes, Sandra Bullock, Danny Glover, Jeff
Goldblum, Steve Martin, Helen Mirren, Michelle Pfeiffer, Martin Short,
Patrick Stewart
Screenplay:  
Producers:  Penney Finkelman Cox, Jeffrey Katzenberg, Sandra Rabins
Runtime:   99 min.
US Distribution: DreamWorks
Rated PG:  intense depiction of thematic elements
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
At the beginning of The Prince of Egypt, I was glad to see a few words
regarding the origin of the story of Moses.  First, it explains that the
source text of the film is the book of Exodus; it then makes the point
that this is the story behind the religion in which "millions of people
believe."  I like this statement because it doesn't explicitly say that
the book of Exodus is factual, or that Christians are the only ones who
are right.  It's just too bad that the film itself does.
The Prince of Egypt is an energetic, visually masterful animated film
of questionable morality.  It depicts the doings of Moses -- his
attempts to free his fellow Hebrews, who have been enslaved by the
Egyptians.  The story is a familiar one:  as an infant, Moses (voiced by
Val Kilmer) is sent down river by his slave mother, only to be rescued
and raised by the Pharaoh (Patrick Stewart) and his wife (Helen Mirren).
  
Moses grows up with his brother Ramses (Ralph Fiennes); but, as a young
man, he learns of his true heredity.   So, Moses heads off into the
desert, rejecting his Princehood and vowing to free his people.  When
his father dies, and Ramses becomes the Pharaoh, Moses is forced to wage
war on Ramses and the Egyptian people.  Along the way, he talks to the
burning bush, parts the Red Sea, and massacres thousands of people for
the good of his own.
I realize that The Prince of Egypt has been adapted from another text,
and that criticizing the material means that, transitively, I'm
attacking the Bible.  The difference between the book of Exodus and this
particular film is that the source text is not so biased -- it shows
both sides of Moses' doings; it explains the horrors of the plague that
destroys the Egyptian people.  The Prince of Egypt, however, is more
interested in setting up a good guy-bad guy scenario, so that the
Pharaoh is simply evil, and Moses is simply good.  But never was I given
a reason to think that Moses was any less sinister than Ramses.
I can't deny that the film is extremely powerful in its visual
presentation.  The animation, particularly in the scene in which Moses
parts the Red Sea, is spectacular.   (I might even go so far as to use
the "jaw-dropping" cliche, because my jaw certainly did drop.)  The film
is lively and entertaining, and paced very well, and features a lot of
talented actors:  Kilmer does a good job sounding important, while
Fiennes does an equally good job sounding sinister.  The supporting cast
is colored in familiar voices, with notable roles by Jeff Goldblum
(present mostly for comic relief), Patrick Stewart, and Danny Glover (as
Jethro).
  
But I have a major problem with the way Moses and his actions are
depicted.  I know this isn't the first time this story has been done
(anyone ever seen The Ten Commandments?), but this is the first time
it's been geared towards kids.  Are kids just supposed to overlook the
scene in which the metaphorical hand of God comes down and slaughters
children in their beds?  Oh sure, the Egyptians are "bad," right?  Yeah,
they're just as "bad" as Southern slaveholders in the 19th century.  
I'll agree that slavery is "bad," but it's not a straightforward issue. 
I'm not attacking religion or Christianity, nor do I think Moses was a
bad guy.   What I'm saying is that The Prince of Egypt is a powerful
movie that would have been much more powerful if it had shown Moses in a
questionable light.  He killed a lot of people, and he did it in the
name of God.  If Moses had lived today, he would have been labeled a
religious fanatic just before being sent to prison.   There are good
lessons to be learned in the Bible, but I think we could have overlooked
the one that tells us that death in the name of God is beautiful.

Author
Nick Amado
Directed by Brenda Chapman and Steve Hickner
Voices of: Val Kilmer, Michelle Pfieffer, Danny Glover, Steve Martin, Jeff Goldblum, Martin Short, Sandra Bullock and Ralph Fiennes
Perhaps the best thing about The Prince of Egypt is that it was
directed as if the characters were tangible, and the camera was
actually moving through the film's dazzling landscape. Modern
technology has afforded animated films the luxury of looking just like
live action films in the way the camera is free to move and focus. Not
only is The Prince Of Egypt pretty to look at, well acted (by the
voices, of course) and well animated, but it is really well directed.
This story comes from the Book of Exodus. It takes us through the
discovery of Moses as a baby as he is taken in by the Pharoah. He is
raised as Egyptian royalty (along with future Pharoah Ramses) even
though he is born Hebrew. As an adult he discovers his true heritage
and exiles himself from Egypt. As a Hebrew shepard, God speaks to him
through the burning bush. The second half of the film is Moses'
journey back into Egypt to confront Ramses and free the Hebrew
slaves. With some artistic liberties (as the begining of the film
claims) the story is faithful. The blood in the water, the plagues,
Passover, the parting of the Red Sea all make their appearance.
Perhaps the only flaw in this film (aside from the abrupt musical
numbers, which are a flaw in ALL musicals) is the set of Ramses'
goons. They are voiced by Martin Short and Steve Martin (the latter of
which is so recognizable that it is extremely distracting). Their
characters simply do not fit, neither thier physical appearance nor
their personalities. Thankfully, they play a rather small
part. Perhaps what makes them flawed is that they seem more fit for a
Disney movie, and Dreamworks clearly wanted to separate themselves
from the notion that they are like thier animation counterparts.
The new digital age really makes its impact in animated films. Digital
effects just don't look real in live action pictures, but they make
animation astounding. There are numerous scenes in The Prince Of Egypt
which were unachievable five years ago. The parting of the Red Sea is
perhaps not the most amazing (as wonderful as it is.) The early
chariot race, the plagues and the burning bush are all equally
powerful.
It is unique to see an animated film tell such a story. There are no
fairy tale elements to this story. What you see can be found in the
bible. And yet as Moses reaches the top of the mount to present to his
people the ten commandments of their god, it is as powerful as Simba's
birth and eventual return to Pride Rock in The Lion King (to me, the
most wonderful animated film of all time.) With Disney's latest turn
for the worst in terms of animation style and weak story and weaker
characters, The Prince Of Egypt stands out as a destined classic. It
has a beautifully unique cinematic style, physically interesting
characters and music that, though unnecessary, does not detract from
the picture. The Prince Of Egypt is one of the year's best motion
pictures.

Author
Kleszczewski, Nicholas
The best scene in _The Prince of Egypt_, a modern animated retelling of
_The Ten Commandments_, occurs after Moses visits God at the burning
bush.  He meets his wife, Tzipporah, and giddily tells her the news,
dances with her, and she steps back slowly in a quiet wonderment.  No
dialogue is heard.  This is all done in pantomime, as Hans Zimmer's
score annunciates what's on the screen.
I highlight this to distinguish what makes _PoE_ different from nearly
ANY other animated film I could remember.  It isn't a typical scene.
In any other film, the (redundant) dialogue would be heard, the
violins would screech to represent Tzipporah's response, and all of
this would occur at an extreme close-up.  Not here.  If Orson Welles
had directed this film, he would have done the same thing.
This film is so gloriously _cinematic_ that it's poetry.  There are
scenes in this film work so visually well that it speaks on multiple
levels.  Take the scene where Moses confronts Rameses and firstborn, in
front of the hieroglyphic indicating the drowning of Hebrew children.
Rameses' son is in the middle of the frame, perfectly situated in the
hieroglyphic jaws of death.  Not only is it a conversation of the
terrible past, but it is a foreshadowing of the worst plague to come.
There's a scene where the young Moses confronts "the man he calls
father", Pharoah Seti.  The backdrop is a giant statue of Seti, and
when they speak, Seti's face matches that of the great monument behind
him.  It's as if young Moses were confronting not just Pharoah, but
centuries-old traditions and authority.  Brilliant.
Then there are the technological achievements that weren't even
possible a few years ago.  Not just the parting of the Red Sea--we've
seen that bit in the coming attractions--but how about the water in
the opening sequence, when Baby Moses is placed in a basket in the
river.  The river itself, swishes, rolls, and plain darn LOOKS LIKE A
REAL RIVER.
Much of Pharoah's kingdom has a scope and greatness that has been
compared to David Lean.  Thousands of extras have been replicated, but
there are no false images.  Even those individuals at a great distance
have an authenticity to them.
The voices are also well done.  Val Kilmer is not my first choice for
Moses, but he brings about a fine metamorphisis: from fun-loving
prankster in the opening reel to dynamic leader.  (I have to remind
myself: didn't he get his start with the sophmoric comedies _Top
Secret!_ and _Real Genius_? ) Ralph Fiennes does an admirable job as
the Pharoah Ramses, and Patrick Stewart even brings in some dignity as
the Pharoah Seti.  Michelle Pfieffer (as Tzipporah) and Martin Short
(as the sorcerer Huy) are the least recognizable, while Jeff Goldblum
(Aaron) and Sandra Bullock (Miriam) have more familiar vocal =
mannerisms.
I can now attest that, after trudging several years through
_Anastasia_ and _Hercules_, the songs _are_ memorable once again.
_When You Believe_ is probably Oscar bound, and only lacks when sung
by the divas Mariah Carey and Whitney Houston.  (That's because it
works better if it were sung simply, not throwing in every nuance of
"ooh-whooah-aaah" that Mariah and Whitney are known for).  Also,
Baby's Lullaby and Heaven's Eyes are also catchy.
None of these tremendous advances in animation, catchy tunes and great
acting would be worth a cent if the story driving it didn't demand
such respect.  And here, in the year of the "tell me a story" film
(_Men With Guns_, _Smoke Signals_, even _Saving Private Ryan_), we
have the mother of all stories.  This is a story that, according to
Deuteronomy, was commanded to be told in every household, for all
generations.
Who doesn't want to relate to a reluctant hero with a nearly
impossible task, demand justice and freedom for the oppressed?  When
God calls Moses to pursue this task, you can see Moses' weakness, his
tremor, his uncertainty.  When he initially fails to have Ramses
relent his torture, the Israelites complain that Moses is making it
worse for them.  Yet somehow he's steadfast, he prevails, follows
strange orders (drop your rod--it will turn to a snake, put the blood
of a lamb over your doorposts), and acheives the impossible.  When
Moses was inbetween the Red Sea and thousands of angry Egyptian
warriors, God had made a way where there was no way.
For all that familiarity, the story is still most poignant and
powerful.  It still speaks many things to many different people,
liberals, conservatives, Jews, Christians, Muslims, atheists, rich,
poor, and so on.  Jeff Goldblum, in a radio interview, raved that this
is a story that, the deeper you look into it, the more you get out of
it.  I couldn't agree more.
Will kids dig it?  I hope so.  But this film isn't for kids, but for
everybody.  The makers at Dreamworks have a philosophy that animation
isn't necessarily a category of itself, but a vehicle to bring about a
story, _any_ story.
_The Prince of Egypt_ is a seminal film.  It will be remembered for
years to come, not only on anniversaries during religious feasts, but
for its' landmark understanding of film, period.  I don't think I'm
exaggerating that this may take animation where _Citizen Kane_ took
mainstream film nearly sixty years ago.

Author
Bob Bloom

  Prince of Egypt (1998). 3 stars out of 4. Featuring the voices of Val
Kilmer, Ralph Fiennes, Sandra Bullock, Patrick Stewart, Steve Martin and
Martin Short.
 Bearing as many burdens as the Hebrew slaves it depicts, The Prince of
Egypt strains to keep itself from collapsing under its own weight.
 The Prince of Egypt is the first animated feature from DreamWorks, the
company formed by Steven Spielberg, David Geffen and Jeffrey Katzenberg.
 And if the feature has the look and feel of a Disney product that's
because before co-founding DreamWorks, Katzenberg ran the Disney studio
where he was responsible for such animated films as Beauty and the Beast
and The Lion King.
 One burden overcome by Prince of Egypt is its comparison to the product of
its rival studio.
 The animation in this retelling of the story of Moses is rich and vivid.
You almost can taste the sand.
 The characters' features are complex and multilayered and, given the
story's setting, brown-hued and distinctive.
 Missing, thankfully, is the now-cliched utilization of any talking
animals. No camels pal around with Moses, offering sage advice. No talking
staffs or sphinxes to make the story more palatable for small children.
 The Prince of Egypt is a reverent retelling of the events in the Book of
Exodus.
 And that is another of its burdens. It is too reverential. This is an
animated feature aimed more at adults than children, yet at a kids-friendly
95-plus-minute running time, it comes off as a "Classics Illustrated"
capsulation of a biblical tale.
 Katzenberg sought input from a number of biblical scholars and religious
leaders in shaping his story. He sought to be fair and politically correct.
 His Rameses (voiced by Ralph Fiennes) is no prideful, strutting demi-god
whose fall is God's retribution for failing to heed His words.
 In his efforts to offend no one, Katzenberg has deflated the dramatic
tension from the story.
 It never soars, never reaches that emotional fervor that Cecil B. DeMille
was able to achieve in his four-hour epic, The Ten Commandments.
 Despite its gaudiness and vulgarity, DeMille created larger-than-life
protagonists, an epic battle of good vs. evil. When the Red Sea swallowed
Pharoah's army, you cheered.
 In Prince of Egypt, the characters' humanity is stressed. Moses (voiced by
Val Kilmer) is a conflicted individual, unsure of his worthiness to lead
his people to freedom, uncertain of the powers bestowed on him by his God,
and saddened by the death and destruction rained upon Egypt.
 This Moses is no Charlton Heston booming, "Let my people go!" Rather, he
is a man filled with doubts struggling to do what is right and fulfill his
divine mission.
 Katzenberg and his writer, Philip LaZebnik, have slightly rewritten
history, making Rameses and Moses brothers rather than cousins.
 This heightens their eventual conflict as well as humanizes the gulf that
separates them.
 What Prince of Egypt lacks in drama is compensated by its superb use of
animation as well as computer graphics. It is fluid, rich in texture and
thematically stunning.
 The parting of the Red Sea, the plagues sequence and the opening scenes of
the baby Moses floating down the Nile are the highlights.
 The vocal talents also are first rate. Kilmer makes a most-human Moses,
while Fiennes' Rameses is less a tyrant than a ruler who cannot
conceptualize the scope of his despotism. His refusal to free the slaves is
not based on cruelty and villainy, as it is on continuing the status quo
and not being "the weak link" in a dynastic empire.
 Hans Zimmer has composed a superb score and the songs of Steven Schwartz
are well done, if not memorable. There is no "Circle of Life," or "Color of
the Wind" in Prince of Egypt.
 The tunes have a Semitic air, with "Through Heavens Eyes" and "When You
Believe" among the best.
 The only misstep is "Playing With the Big Boys," a Vegas-like showstopper
performed by Steve Martin and Martin Short as Pharoah's court magicians,
that seems out of place.
 The Prince of Egypt is wonderful filmmaking. It may not reach the grandeur
one expects, but it still touches your heart and soul.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or
cbloom@iquest.net

Author
Fontaine Lien
"And Moses stretched out his hand over the sea; and the Lord caused the
sea to go back by a strong east wind all that night, and made the sea dry
land, and the waters were divided." -- Exodus 14:21
        It's one thing reading the Exodus chapter in a church, in a retreat, in
a classroom, or even seeing the old black and white version on TV.  It's
another *seeing* Moses take his staff, raise his eyes towards the sky, and
part the ocean.  In the DreamWorks cartoon adaptation of possibly the
most famous story of all, image is the emphasis and they do a darn good
job of emphasizing it.  For believers, this film will be a major spiritual
experience; for nonbelievers (like me), it will be two hours of magic and
jaw-dropping awe.  Suffice to say that for at least two hours, I almost
became a believer.
        As I said, the film's strong point is its animation.  You probably
already know that from the previews alone.  There are amazing sequences
in the film: as the Hebrews are passing through the wall of water on the
Red Sea, we briefly catch a glimpse of a whale behind the wall of
aquablue.  During one spectacular dream sequence, Moses dreams that he's
trapped in the walls of the castle, that he became one of the Egyptian
figures on the wall.   Guards chase him from corner to corner, from pillar
to pillar.  And one of my favorite scenes from the movie: when God sends a
plague to Egypt.  It originates as a sort of mini-galaxy in the sky, the
ghostly white tendrils dancing eerily across the pitch-black sky, winding
their way through town, deftly avoiding houses with the mark of lamb's
blood.  It's graceful, haunting, and solemn at the same time.  It's quiet, but
the kind of quiet we see in those shots of Paris we get before the city
gets blown up in "Armageddon."   I especially admire the way they drew
the water in this movie: from the gentle river little Moses is first placed
in, to the river that Moses/God turns into blood, to the dividing Red Sea. 
The light, too.  The light Moses is bathed in when he sees the burning bush,
the aforementioned eery whiteness of the plague.  Of course, overall the
artwork is just amazing.   I liked how they weren't trying to be too
"Disney," adding too many funny creatures.  But then again, this is a
different kind of story.  Not only was the art itself stunning, you've got to
give the director (or animator?) credit for arranging the objects to give
them symbolic meaning, sometimes obvious and sometimes not so obvious.
        Having said that the art is the movie's strong point, I'll have to say
that aside from the "Deliver Me" tune and much-better-than-radio-version
"When You Believe" (gracefully weaved together at the end of the movie),
most of the other song numbers don't fit in too well for me.  "You're
Playing w/ the Big Guys Now" just doesn't seem appropriate here.  This is
not another "Hercules." The score was pretty good most of the time: it
worked best when it was quiet, some of the dramatic moments were a
little distracting.  To me, it had a chant-like feel to it that is very similar
to the score of "The Lion King."  The voices were okay -- they weren't
distracting, and that's a good thing.  Val Kilmer did a great job as
Moses/God; I didn't even know that was him until later.  In fact, the only
voice I could recognize was Jeff Goldblum's, if only because he has just a
distinctive way of speaking and I've see way too many iMac commercials.  
        "The Prince of Egypt" is a film for adults and children alike
(possibly more for adults).  Whether you're a believer or not, you'll be
touched by the story of the people of Moses striving for freedom and
clinging steadfastedly to one single beliefe: that their God will come
through.  I don't know, sometimes I feel that religion causes nothing but
trouble in this world; hence if there are more films like this one that
reminds us of what's ultimately good and true in the teachings of religion
(i.e., the faith it instills in its believers), they are perfectly welcome in
an age where most of us are morely likely to scoff at the devoutly
religious.  What's wrong with believing in miracles?
"It is not the noise of the shout of victory, Nor the noise of the cry of
defeat, But the sound of singing I hear." -- Exodus 32:18
Rating: B+ (First viewing, 12/23/98)
* Is it just me, or do the mountains of Midian look kind of like the
mountains of Paramount Pictures? (Which wouldn't make sense at all,
since this isn't a Paramount Pictures film. . . )

Author
Scott Renshaw
THE PRINCE OF EGYPT
(DreamWorks)
Voices:  Val Kilmer, Ralph Fiennes, Michelle Pfeiffer, Sandra Bullock,
Jeff Goldblum, Patrick Stewart, Steve Martin, Martin Short.
Screenplay:  Philip LaZebnik.
Producers:  Penny Finkelman Cox and Sandra Rabins.
Directors:  Brenda Chapman, Steve Hickner and Simon Wells.
MPAA Rating:  PG (adult themes)
Running Time:  97 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     There's precaution, and then there's what DreamWorks has done to
insure that THE PRINCE OF EGYPT would not become a lightning rod for
controversy.  Religious leaders were consulted on early drafts of the
script; word went forth that this would be a serious, respectful dramatic
film with no Disney-style animals for comic relief.  The film-makers even
attached an opening disclaimer about "artistic license" taken with the
story, which also referred viewers to the Book of Exodus for the Biblical
story of Moses.  The public relations message has been strong and
consistent:  befitting its subject matter, THE PRINCE OF EGYPT would be a
different sort of animated film.
     In some very important ways, that message was completely accurate.
THE PRINCE OF EGYPT is a visually spectacular and impressively faithful
account of the first 14 chapters of Exodus, beginning with Moses' mother
placing him in a basket on the Nile to save him from Pharaoh's order to
slay Hebrew newborns.  The basket reaches the palace of the Pharaoh, where
Moses is found by the Queen (Helen Mirren) and raised as a brother to
Rameses, heir apparent to the Pharaoh Seti (Patrick Stewart).  As adults,
Moses (Val Kilmer) and Rameses (Ralph Fiennes) are close companions,
little concerned with the plight of Hebrew slaves.  That's before a chance
encounter with his birth sister Miriam (Sandra Bullock) informs Moses of
his true lineage, and sends him on a course which will set him against
Rameses as liberator of his people.
     Some viewers may be troubled by the fact that the key relationship in
THE PRINCE OF EGYPT is that between Moses and Rameses, not that between
God and His chosen people.  While God is certainly present in the film,
the religious elements have been subsumed to the human elements.  The
result is still an extremely strong story of two men both troubled by
their destinies.  Moses laments when he realizes that his calling must
take him from his luxurious life as a prince, while Rameses struggles with
the mantle of leadership.  Rameses' character actually ends up the more
compelling of the two, with Ralph Fiennes giving expressive voice to the
ruler tormented by the fact that the only friend he has known has become
his only enemy.  It's a tricky element to introduce -- that we should care
about a personal tragedy in this tale of God's commitment to the Hebrews
-- but it works to give the film the feel of a mature drama rather than
just another animated fairy tale.
     With such a strong foundation, it becomes distracting when THE PRINCE
OF EGYPT adopts the rhythms and songs of a typical animated musical.
Stephen Schwartz's tunes are generally solid, but it becomes too easy to
think of the film as nothing special when the structure ventures into such
familiar territory.  There's no need for a Biblical epic to turn into "Les
Miserables," or the Old Testament equivalent of "Jesus Christ Superstar",
particularly when the images unaccompanied by music are so compelling.
The slaying of the Egyptians' newborns unfolds with a chilly silence; the
trek across the floor of the Red Sea is set against brief lightning-strike
illuminations of whale silhouettes behind walls of water.  There's enough
story to this story, and enough vision to the animation, not to require a
tune every 10 minutes.
     In a way, the inclusion of musical numbers could have been an attempt
to make THE PRINCE OF EGYPT a transitional form of feature animation.  It
was no surprise to find a screening audience filled with children; it was,
however, something of a surprise to notice them so engaged in such a
somber, challenging story.  Perhaps the songs, and the occasional flashes
of humor, served to ease younger viewers into something not so far removed
from the videos that line their parents' shelves.  DreamWorks tackled an
incredibly challenging task in THE PRINCE OF EGYPT, the task of turning
scripture into family entertainment.  It's about as successful a
conclusion to that task as I can imagine, one which combines tradition and
imagination into a powerful animated experience.

Author
Ricardo A Lafaurie Jr.
This is my first review that I post to this newsgroup, and I kind of
feel like I have to say something negative about this film.  No one
else seems to care that it takes certain liberties that should not be
taken with a historical story.  However, even if one thinks of it as
fiction, "The Prince of Egypt" remains shallow.  But I'll begin from
the beginning.  The biggest difference between the original, Biblical
story and this version is that Moses has some semblance of divinity in
the Bible, whereas the animated version gives the impression of a
reluctant hero.  Maybe it's just me, but if I knew I had God on my
side, I'd have a little bit more confidence.  There are other
differences as well, such as a lack of important female characters and
the passing over of the original Pharoah's death like it's nothing but
a thing.  Most of all, though, the story's focus has shifted.  Rather
than being a story about father-son, man-ethnicity, man-God, "The
Prince of Egypt" is almost solely about the brother-brother
relationship between Rameses and Moses.  I was originally excited
about this story element until I saw the movie, where it came off as
maudlin.  Rameses and Moses squabble like children and then, in the
interests of peace, Moses saves Rameses' butt, even though Moses was
the one who started it... *yawn* I didn't care anymore by the time
Moses ran off for murdering an overseer (which, of course, never
happened in the original story - Moses was exiled).  But enough about
the differences.  Let's talk about the movie itself.  It features a
Moses who, in the interests of making the character more human, lacks
any divinity whatsoever, which isn't convincing at all to anyone who
knows who God is.  It features a cookie-cutter "I-wanna-please-dada"
Rameses, who at least is given dignity by the voicework of Ralph
Fiennes (from Schindler's List, among other things).  The film also
features an extremely annoying character by way of the "new-improved"
Miriam, voiced by the ever-antsy Sandra Bullock, even though the most
irritating thing about her is her tendency to burst into song for no
apparent reason (here Bullock is replaced by a singing voice).
Speaking of which, it contains *very* annoying music.  It contains
shallow writing.  It features extraordinary animation, which is one
good thing I can say about this film.  Most of all, it contains an
attempt to commercialize, homogenize, and mass-market a story about a
Manifestation of God.  I am not Christian, but I got the impression of
blasphemy.  The writers and producers took a butcher knife and
chop-chopped into the story.

Author
Ross Anthony
The Exodus story painted and song into fiery crimson frames and enchanting
hymns; "The Prince of Egypt" delivers with Charleston Heston "Ten
Commandments" strength, the stern story of the Passover. Val Kilmer's voice
breathes Moses to life, Michelle Pfeiffer speaks for the sassy Tzipporah
with Ralph Fiennes bringing the same "faulted-stone" presence of his "Quiz
Show" to the Rameses Character.
I like a movie that grabs me from the get go. Take a vulnerable crying
newborn, put him in a woven basket and send him drifting down a river full
of crocodiles. I'm watching. The melodies to the haunting song "Deliver"
flow with the same grace and enchantment of the oil painted currents under
the baby Moses. This gorgeous somber scene spills into a rushing chariot
race as exciting as the best car chase scenes around.
The movie focuses on the relationship between two brothers Moses and
Rameses -- the love they cannot deny for each other and the chasm of faith,
purpose and mission large enough to part the Red Sea. A fantastic
psychedelic motif of Hieroglyphics are used to "enlighten" Moses of his
heritage as a Hebrew and the horrifying nightmarish truth of the pharaoh
(the man he used to call father). My breath slowed, eyes watered, and a
chill similar to that of the breath of Passover plague crawled up my neck as
Moses realizes his father drowned countless Hebrew babes. In fact, you might
consider leaving your younger ones with a babysitter due to this serious
subject matter.
No one is denying that the parting of the red sea scene from "The Ten
Commandments" is a powerful special effect (especially for it's time). Don't
worry, "Prince of Egypt" tidal waves command that same awe. I believe the
people at DreamWorks put their brushes to the film with the spirit Moses put
his staff in the mighty Nile, lighting it up with the eerie color of
bloodshed. This is a powerful engaging film.
The Prince of Egypt. Animated Feature. Rated PG.
Voices of Val Kilmer, Michelle Pfeiffer and other big names.
Directed by Brenda Chapman.
Grade..........................A+
--
Copyright Š 1999 Ross Anthony, currently based in Los Angeles, has scripted
and shot documentaries, music videos, and shorts in 35 countries across
North America, Europe, Africa and Asia. For more reviews visit:
http://RossAnthony.com

Author
James Sanford

 If you cringe at the notion of an animated musical version of the story of
Moses, you might be tempted to steer clear of "The Prince of Egypt."
 Don't.
 Unless, of course, you don't mind missing out on one of the year's most
distinctive, lovingly made movies, a picture that turns a familiar story
into something suprisingly exciting, moving and -- yes -- even funny. In a
word, "Prince" rules.
 Put aside pre-conceived notions about what Biblical dramas should look like
onscreen; though elephantine spectacles like "The Ten Commandments" may have
dazzled audiences 40 years ago, the legions of animators behind "Prince"
have conjured up richly imaginative visions of the Burning Bush, the exodus
of the Hebrews and, most astonishingly, the parting of the Red Sea that must
have Cecil B. DeMille seething with envy in his grave.
 Though the push in animation in recent years has been toward achieving
either stunningly life-like movement (as in Disney's "Lion King" and
"Pocahontas") or using computers to dream up almost three-dimensional
fantasy worlds ("Toy Story," "Antz"), the people behind "Prince" have
intentionally opted for more expressionistic figures and for opulence and
texture over precise detail, and have succeeded; you can almost feel the
rippling blue waters of the Nile and the gritty walls of the Pyramids. Even
the less-than-religious in the audience will find plenty to appreciate, both
in the visuals and in the sprinklings of humor throughout the film -- the
joke about the Sphinx's missing nose is genuinely smart.
 Viewers may be so swept away by the elegance of the production they won't
automatically recognize the phenomenal array of talent providing the voices
for the characters. If it's possible to earn an Oscar nomination for an
offscreen performance, Ralph Fiennes certainly deserves one for his
magnificent reading of the proud but troubled Rameses, one of the most
striking figures ever to appear in an animated film.
 But the rest of the cast do not fade into Fiennes' shadow. Val Kilmer's
Moses sounds properly impassioned, Michelle Pfeiffer lends her edgy warmth
to Moses' spirited wife Tzipporah, and even Sandra Bullock hits the right
defiant notes as Moses' older sister Miriam.
 The only performers who seem out of place are Steve Martin and Martin Short
as daffy high priests, and that's due less to the actors than to the script,
which can't find a way to work them into the story's flow. Their musical
number "Playin' With the Big Boys" is a show-stopper in the wrong sense of
the term.
 The other songs do an admirable job of advancing the plot, especially the
rousing "Through Heaven's Eyes," which condenses Moses and Tzipporah's
meeting, courtship and wedding into four lively minutes, and "When You
Believe," which sets in motion the movie's stunningly beautiful finale.
Animation fans have been blessed with a bumper crop of outstanding works to
choose from this year -- "Mulan," "Antz," "A Bug's Life" -- but this regal,
sensational "Prince" is in a class by itself.
James Sanford

Author
Luke Buckmaster
Featuring the voices of: Val Kilmer, Ralph Fiennes, Sandra Bullock, Jeff
Goldblum, Michelle Pfeiffer, Danny Glover, Patrick Stewart, Helen
Mirren, Steve Martin, Martin Short
Directors: Brenda Chapman, Steve Hickner, Simon Wells
Australian theatrical release: December 26, 1998
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
4 stars
Perhaps for the first time in Hollywood history, Dreamworks has made the
seemingly impossible: an adult animated musical.  Anyone who says that
The Prince of Egypt is not a rare find is either an extreme pessimist or
a Disney employee; this film is a breakthrough for animation, in terms
of writing and conveying a potentially controversial screenplay and
creating breath taking visuals.
In fact, Dreamworks went to great measures to make sure that The Prince
of Egypt would not be a victim of religious criticism for not following
the book of Exodus accurately.  Drafts of the script were approved by
religious leaders, and there is even text before the film explaining
that "artistic license" must be taken into account.  Quite miraculously,
for a story based on Christian text, The Prince of Egypt does not
preach, bore or intimidate.  Against all odds, this is the best animated
film of 1998, and one of my personal favorites of the last few years
(ranking with The Hunchback of Notre Damn and Batman: Mask of the
Phantasm).
The highlight of Prince of Egypt is the dynamic chemistry between its
two crucial characters; men who are brothers in their hearts but have
very different futures ahead of them.  One is Rameses (voice of Ralph
Fiennes), the son of Pharaoh (Patrick Stewart), who was born destined to
rule Egypt.  The other is Moses (Val Kilmer), who was adopted by the
Pharaoh's wife after he was found floating down a river as a baby, in
the time that Pharaoh ordered all Hebrew infants to be killed.  By the
time that Moses realizes that he is a Hebrew - the same people who are
slaves to Pharaoh - he is a young man and is chosen by God to lead his
people out of slavery.
That's quite a story for a "family film" to handle.  In my Babe: Pig in
the City review I stated that some scenes would be distressing for
children to watch, and it seems only fair that I issue a similar warning
in regards to The Prince of Egypt. This film depicts the harassment of
the Hebrew people openly and vividly, but whereas Babe often seemed like
nothing more than a freak show, The Prince of Egypt is honest about its
setting and doesn't pretend that everything is harmless and innocent.
As Moses battles Rameses for the Hebrew's freedom towards the film's
conclusion, we can understand what he is fighting for and at the same
time what he is missing out on - the life of a prince compared to the
life of a true leader.
Visually, The Prince of Egypt is a triumph.  Just as Antz and A Bug's
Life had unique styles of animation, so does this.  Some moments of the
film go beyond just being visually impressive; they are enchanting and
sensational.  These scenes include Moses' encounter with God (in the
form of a burning bush) and the parting of the Red Sea (which alone took
animators over two years of work to complete).  However terrific the
visuals may be, though, is nothing compared to the potency of the
screenplay.  I haven't been this impressed by a script since The Truman
Show, and this mesmerized by visuals since What Dreams May Come.
Whilst there are (thankfully) no singing animals in The Prince of Egypt,
it is very much a musical.  If you can imagine a biblical story brought
to life with the power of, say, Les Miserables, you may have a
reasonable idea of what this is like.   Some of the featured songs are
powerful and moving - such as "Deliver Us," which is performed Ofra Haza
and Eden Riegel, and "When You Believe," performed by Mariah Carey and
Whitney Houston.  These songs are great, and help make the film
accessible for all ages.
I can honestly say that while watching The Prince of Egypt, I never
really noticed the talented array of voices until I looked at the
credits.  Val Kilmer and Ralph Fiennes are sensational in the two
hardest parts, but everybody is impressive.  This is the first animated
film I have seen in which I not only forgot about its voices, I often
forgot that it was animated.  Which is strange, since the color and life
that the animation generates is unlike anything that a live action film
could create.    As impressive as The Ten Commandments was, The Prince
of Egypt is both an epic and a spectacle, packaged as a mainstream and
accessible film by musical numbers and illustrious animation.  This is
cinema in its grandest form, combining an aged but unforgettable tale
with breath-taking visual techniques.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Alphalink Movies:
http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Author
Mark O'Hara
A Film Review by Mark O'Hara
Visit Online Film Critics Society at http://www.ofcs.org
Important stories have a way of getting themselves retold.  As part of 
the greatest story ever told, the story of Moses is done up with amazing 
technical skill and a good amount of interest in DreamWorks' 'The Prince 
of Egypt.'
In a wonderfully poetic opening sequence, we watch Moses' mother place 
him in a basket.  But he does not float serenely through the bulrushes;  
instead the infant is nearly ruined by crocodiles, hippopotami, and 
several boats.  Finally he is rescued by the Queen (voice of Helen 
Mirren).  So much for background, as the action jumps twenty or so years 
to show an unrealistic but hilarious chariot race between the two sons 
of Pharoah - Rameses (Ralph Fiennes) and the adopted Moses (Val Kilmer).  
There is a bond between the brothers that gives the very story mythic 
overtones, as we know the bond must eventually be shattered.
The meat of the story covers Moses' transformation from prince to Hebrew 
prophet.  In one scene Moses runs upon his real sister, Miriam (Sandra 
Bullock), and brother, Aaron (Jeff Goldblum).  Of course he rejects any 
notion of being related to these lowly slaves.  The movie does a nice 
job of portraying the subtle reckonings of memory:  Moses somehow 
recovers familiarity with Miriam's song, the one his mother sang to him 
in his infancy.  But this is only the first in a series of revelations.  
After Moses irrevocably severs his connections with the Egyptian court, 
he takes to living with desert people, serving the priest of Midian, 
Jethro (Danny Glover).  Moses and Jethro's daughter Tzipporah (Michelle 
Pfeiffer) marry, and after a time Moses (as a pre-Christ figure) gives 
up his private life as a shepherd and fulfills God's will.
'The Prince of Egypt' would not benefit from comparison to Cecil B. De 
Mille's classic 'The Ten Commandments.'  'Commandments' has the length 
and expanse of an epic - three hours of human struggle with no songs or 
animated whimsicality to lighten the subject matter.  Yes, it is dated 
by the time in which it was made, but 'dated' does not mean 'bad.'  The 
scope of the narrative in De Mille's movie is breath-taking and, 
besides, Charlton Heston's voice has it all over Val Kilmer's.  'Prince' 
probably benefits from it shortness, considering its main audience is 
children.  The most remarkable miraculous events are touched upon - the 
infestations of frogs and locusts, pestilence, and a scary sequence - 
the origin of Passover, in which the first-born of Egypt (except those 
whose lintels are marked with the blood of the lamb) die with the most 
forlorn of exhalations.  This animated feature does fair justice to 
these serious events.
The most striking, I think, is the Red Sea parting.  This was my 
favorite scene, and my son's.  It has been broadcast far that DreamWorks 
spent countless human hours depicting the attempt of Moses and the Jews 
to leave Egypt, only to be blocked by the sea.  Rameses' legions are 
bearing down upon them, creating an almost perfect dramatic moment.  
Executive producer Jeffrey Katzenberg and his entire staff have 
accomplished a magnificent task, a five-plus minute sequence of terror 
and wonder that is as fascinating to watch as any moments filmed.  What 
an idea - to show the ocean life as the fleeing people stumble under the 
vast curtains of parted water!
Other strong parts of the production include music and original 
storytelling.  My wife and daughter - both very able musicians - liked 
the songs.  Ten-year-old Kristin claims to have almost cried during 
"Deliver Us" and "All I Ever Wanted."  I was struck by the layered 
texture of the song during which Hotep and Huy (voices of Martin Short 
and Steve Martin) are trying to upstage Moses and his 'trick' with his 
staff.  We hear the names of Egyptian gods, voices chanting in the 
background, over top of which Short and Martin sing the main lyrics.  
(The lyrics themselves - "You're playing with the big boys now" - are 
not as strong as those in other songs, though.) Another fabulous 
sequence was a dream in which Moses continues to realize his Hebrew 
heritage.  Although the sequence is not sung, it is dramatized through 
animated hieroglyphic-like figures.  Moses as pictograph flees from 
legions of soldiers.  Then in a stunning epiphany, Moses awakens and 
runs to the actual wall on which this verse from the book of Exodus is 
recorded (1:22): "Pharaoh then commanded all his subjects, 'Throw into 
the river every boy that is born to the Hebrews, but you may let all the 
girls live'."  All his adoptive father can utter in explanation is, 
"They were only slaves."
The animation style is original and well-drawn.  Many of the characters 
seem attenuated, rather Barbie-like in shape, but this is in keeping 
with the Egyptian imagery of the pictographs -dogs and gods of graceful 
slimness.  Pharoah is done with kingly splendor, like the sphinxes and 
other likenesses modeled after him.  Patrick Stewart lends an 
appropriately regal voice to this character.  Most of the other actors 
perform admirably in their voice roles.  They are, if nothing else, 
transparently efficient.  Ones that draw positive attention to 
themselves include Stewart, Jeff Goldblum (you can see his cerebral 
fussiness in Aaron's mannerisms, too), Ralph Fiennes, and, in a tiny 
role, Danny Glover.
In all, 'The Prince of Egypt' is not to be missed.  Forgo other holiday 
films for this one, regardless of your age.  It is destined to be 
included in the canon of filmed Biblical literature and, besides, it's a 
lot of fun.


Author
David Wilcock
Starring The Voices Of: Val Kilmer and Ralph Fiennes
Directed By Brenda Chapman, Steve Hickner and Simon Wells.
Running Time: 1 hour 37 minutes
After the average Mouse Hunt, the silly Small Soldiers and the entertaining
Antz, Dreamworks try again with the children's film market with this
stunning adaptation of the Moses story. As the film warns us at the
beginning, it's not the full story, and some liberties have been taken, but
generally this the Bible story we all know and love, featuring burning
bushes, the plagues and the parting of the red sea. The only thing missing
is Charlton Heston. Instead, we get Val Kilmer voicing Moses, an hebrew who
is placed in a river by his mother and rescued by the Queen of Egypt (Helen
Mirren.) We flash forward several years to see Moses and brother Rameses
(Fiennes) all grown up. Moses soon finds out from brother and sister Miriam
and Aaron (Sandra Bullock and Jeff Goldblum) that he isn't really the son of
the Pharaoh Seti (Patrick Stewart) and that it his destiny to free the
Hebrews from the Egyptians tyrannical rule. He soon sets about this, along
with his wife Tzipporah (Michelle Pfeiffer.) Rameses and his two wizard
friends (voiced by Steve Martin and Martin Short) try to stop Moses
completing his task.
While the plot is familiar and somewhat exciting for adults, for children
reared on Aladdin and Hercules, this film could  be the most godawful thing
they've ever seen. Gone is the quick fire humour and standard, easy to
follow plot. But, spectacularly, and to Dreamworks credit, nearly every
child in the audience was captivated by the story and events happening on
screen. Jeffrey Katzenberg, who produced this film, certainly knows how to
keep a child interested. He's included some songs in the film, plus some
comedy, and a exciting chariot chase, to keep the children interested. And
somehow, himself and the directors still manage to get all the drama and
intensity of the story across, without ever being boring. It's a remarkable
achievement.
Also remarkable is the animation, which puts Hercules, an almost 'slap dash'
effort, to shame. Relying on hand drawn and computer animation, the
backgrounds and characters are amazingly detailed. The film seems a little
caught up with it's amazing visuals by showing a lot of sweeping visuals and
'moving' shots, but they _do_ look incredible. The final 'plague' where God
kills every first born child, and the parting of the red sea have to be seen
to be believed. Kudos to the animators.
The vocal talent is also very good. Val Kilmer does a fine job as Moses
(although he doesn't sing) and Ralph Fiennes is superb as Rameses (and he
_does_ sing.) Sandra Bullock and Jeff Goldblum are great, and Steve Martin
and Martin Short are very good, but not in the film long enough. Finally,
Michelle Pfeiffer does excellent work as Moses wife. Kudos also goes to the
voice of God, who instead of booming and bombastic is quiet and subdued.
Sadly, he is uncredited, and I couldn't quite work out who the voice was.
(But e-mail if you do.)
The songs are good, ranging from the usual love sonnets to the traditional
big production number. They don't disturb the movie, and while not
particularly memorable, they are nice to listen to (they're well sung
aswell.) The musical score is suitably epic, with some beautiful tunes.
Coupled with the superb visuals, The Prince Of Egypt is a visual and aural
treat, backed up with a great story. Entertaining both for kids and adults,
this film is a must see.
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!
"You know, for kids"- Norville Barnes

Author
Craig Roush
Release Date: December 18, 1998
The Voices of: Val Kilmer, Ralph Fiennes, Sandra Bullock, Jeff Goldblum,
Danny Glover, Michelle Pfeiffer, Patrick Stewart, Steve Martin, Martin
Short, Helen Mirren
Directed by: Brenda Chapman, Steve Hickner, Simon Wells
Distributed by: DreamWorks Pictures
MPAA Rating: PG (intense depiction of thematic elements) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/prince.htm
Near the end of 1996, analysts remarked that the year would be the last
in which Disney would stand alone as the animation king. The following
year, 1997, saw the first sleeper entry into the genre from a studio
other than the Magic Kingdom: Twentieth Century Fox gave baronial Russia
to the masses in the form of ANASTASIA. At best, that's all it was -- a
sleeper hit, designed to surprise but not shake the industry. In 1998,
however, things have been decidedly different. There have been a number
of pushes on Disney's death grip on the market, and fifty-one weeks into
'98, a new champion has emerged. 
DreamWorks' THE PRINCE OF EGYPT succeeds where all of the other
conventionally animated products have failed. The other two contenders,
Warner Brothers' QUEST FOR CAMELOT and Disney's own annual entry, MULAN,
lacked inspiration and drive respectively. Although CAMELOT was
borderline-abysmal, and can't really be considered a shot at the title,
MULAN had the makings of winner. Unfortunately, it was saturated with
traditional, Disney-cute animation, and lost points against the
rapidly-changing face of the competition. In making THE PRINCE OF EGYPT,
DreamWorks has strayed from all of these hallmarks and created a
genuinely unique product. 
The animation is flawless, and, aside from A BUG'S LIFE, is the
best-looking movie to date. The animators have nimbly mixed both flat
and spatial effects, and the 2D/3D combination is something that artists
from Disney and Fox have heretofore struggled with. The key to success,
however, was that the visuals were used not just because they looked
cool but also as a method of advancing the plot. Namely, some of the
most important action sequences (like the parting of the Red Sea) were
done almost entirely in 3D. DreamWorks is the first studio to prove that
they've got the stuff of success, and that they're capable of
challenging Disney. 
The story is also well-written, and the characters voiced with talent.
For the most part, the plot follows its source material -- the Book of
Exodus -- although only in the most general sense. The writers took a
few creative liberties, and most do not damage the story in any way. In
fact, the Shakespearean relationship between Moses (Val Kilmer) and the
Pharaoh Rameses (Ralph Fiennes) makes the story more interesting if
anything. Moses, a Hebrew, is saved from the slaughter of the firstborn
sons by his mother when she sets him in a basket on the Nile; he floats
into the Pharaoh Seti (Patrick Stewart)'s palace and is taken in by the
royal family. Moses grows up but learns of his heritage and flees into
the desert, where he discovers the burning bush and is commissioned by
God to return to Egypt and free the slaves. By this time, Rameses is now
Pharaoh, and the two brothers, now on opposite sides of the line, face
off in a battle of wills and divine intervention. 
The cast of voices is most impressive, and also includes such noteables
as Sandra Bullock, Jeff Goldblum, Danny Glover, and Steve Martin. The
script does not have a lot of one-liners in it, and God is reduced to a
voice that might well be mistaken for the same one that spoke to Kevin
Costner in FIELD OF DREAMS, but overall the story is exciting and
interesting. It's decidedly for an older crowd, and the tykes who
haven't had a few years of religion class will be hopelessly lost. But
for those who make the bid, THE PRINCE OF EGYPT can be a great watch.

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
The Prince of Egypt (1998)
Val Kilmer, Ralph Fiennes, Michelle Pfeiffer, Sandra Bullock, Jeff 
Goldblum, Danny Glover, Patrick Stewart, Helen Mirren, Steve Martin, 
Martin Short. Produced by Penney Finkelman Cox and Sandra Rabins. 
Screenplay by Philip LaZebnik. Directed by Brenda Chapman, Steve Hickner 
and Simon Wells. 97 minutes.
Rated PG, 3.5 stars (out of five stars)
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
www.nuvo-online.com
Archive reviews at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Edward+Johnson-ott
To receive reviews by e-mail at no charge, send subscription requests to 
pbbp24a@prodigy.com
Let's get the basics out of the way. "The Prince of Egypt" is a well-
acted, great-looking movie. While the animators' attempts to fully 
integrate computer-generated images with traditional drawings are not 
always successful, the story of Moses is still visually sumptuous, aided 
immeasurably by impressive cinematography worthy of a live-action film. 
The sunbaked desert vistas are quite handsome and a few scenes, notably 
the parting of the Red Sea and a raucous chariot race, are dazzling. That 
said, "The Prince of Egypt" is not quite the awe-inspiring epic it wants 
to be.
The film opens with a disclaimer informing viewers that what they are 
about to see is true to the "essence and values" of its Biblical source. 
While preparing the lavish DreamWorks feature, hundreds of religious 
leaders were consulted to avoid stepping on anyone's toes. At the same 
time, the producers tried to avoid excessively pious displays that might 
alienate mainstream audiences. The result is a movie too careful for its 
own good. The filmmakers strive for dramatic grandeur while walking on 
eggshells, and their caution shows up onscreen. 
Put simply, "The Prince of Egypt" doesn't know what to do with God. In 
contemporary Western culture, most people try to lead spiritual lives, 
but are vague about religious specifics. We view God in fuzzy terms at 
best, as some benign omnipotent parent, the personification of love. 
Aside from a noisy fundamentalist minority, most people tend to embrace 
the gentle "do unto others" philosophy of the New Testament over the fire 
and brimstone violence of the Old Testament. 
All of this left DreamWorks with a dilemma; how to stay relatively true 
to the Moses saga from the Book of Exodus without putting off audiences 
uncomfortable with a wrathful God given to extremely vicious outbursts 
towards those who offend him. Their solution was to put the emphasis 
firmly on the human elements of the story. While the relationship between 
Moses and his adoptive brother Rameses is involving, and the Hebrews' 
quest for freedom stirring, the sheer majesty of a people moving closer 
to the Almighty is muted by the film's cautious approach. During most of 
the story, God plays like a special effect instead of a deity. 
The burning bush scene is surprisingly tepid, feeling more like a 
conversation between Luke Skywalker and Yoda than one between Moses and 
God. In one confrontation between the brothers, Moses' walking stick 
turns into a snake and, instead of being awestruck, his brother simply 
has his minions call on their deities to do some stunts of their own. The 
exhibition of dueling magic tricks is too ordinary, just a bit of 
"Fantasia" sorcery with Biblical trappings. Overall, the story comes off 
like a lush animated historical tale of people escaping slavery, 
augmented by nifty special effects, rather than a supernatural encounter 
with an all-powerful presence. Come to think of it, the climax of 
"Raiders of the Lost Ark" had more of a "Holy Cow, we're actually 
witnessing the power of God!" feel than most of this movie. 
The extended sequence displaying the parting of the Red Sea is the one 
section of the film that fully realizes its potential as an old-fashioned 
religious spectacular. The great upwards rush of water, an image of a 
whale swimming near the Hebrews and the physical detailing of the ocean 
floor combine for a scene that genuinely looks like a miracle. 
If only the rest of the film worked as well. Even the story's other 
visual high point, an exhilarating chariot race, suffers from the awkward 
inclusion of a computer-generated nose falling from a huge statue that 
looks like it was superimposed over the rest of the scene. Throughout the 
feature, contrasting styles of drawing tend to clash. While the humans 
are have a nicely stylized, semi-realistic appearance, many of the 
animals are drawn in the classic Disney fashion. Thankfully, none of them 
talk, although they look as if they could. 
For the most part, the film's show-tunes are dull and intrusive. The 
orchestral score incorporates some musical elements indigenous to the 
setting, but the bulk of the music is standard fare. As for the acting, 
an all-star cast delivers uniformly good performances, lending 
credibility to the often-stilted dialogue. Stand-outs include Val Kilmer 
as Moses, Ralph Fiennes as Rameses and Patrick Stewart, using his 
magnificent voice to give appropriate thunder to the imperious Pharaoh.
DreamWorks is promoting "The Prince of Egypt" as a landmark in animation 
and a transcendent experience. I would caution you to lower your 
expectations. The acting, cinematography, and most of the animation more 
than make up for the cheesy songs and occasionally anachronistic dialogue.
 Had the filmmakers made fewer concessions to contemporary sensibilities, 
this could have been a real barn-burner. But they forgot the crucial fact 
that to create a religious epic, God has to make more than a cameo 
appearance.

Author
Dustin Putman
  Directed by Brenda Chapman, Steve Hickner, Simon Wells.
  Voices: Val Kilmer, Ralph Fiennes, Michelle Pfeiffer, Sandra Bullock, 
  Jeff Goldblum, Patrick Stewart, Martin Short, Steve Martin, Helen 
  Mirren, Ofra Haza.
  1998 - 98 minutes.
  Rated PG (for mature themes and violence; appropriate for children 7 and
up).
  Reviewed December 19, 1998.
  By Dustin Putman
  Dustin Putman's Film
 Reviews >
  1998 was such a dismal year for animated features (I gave negative 
  reviews to "Antz," "The Rugrats Movie," and "A Bug's Life") that I was 
  beginning to think I had somehow outgrown them, even though I knew that 
  wasn't true since I still loved the majority of animated pictures in the 
  past. So, it's funny how the last film in that genre for the year turned 
  out to be Dreamworks' first foray into basic animation, "The Prince of 
  Egypt," which is an awe-inspiring, amazing achievement that not only is 
  refreshingly more serious and realistic than the usual dull recent 
  Disney movies, but enraptured me in its spell from the first powerful 
  sequence to the last.
  Based on the biblical story of Moses, Dreamworks, no doubt, had a 
  difficult film on their hands to make, particularly since it was to be 
  an animated film and the subject matter is uplifting, yet very dark. 
  Thankfully, Dreamworks seems to be far more mature than Disney, for if 
  they had made it, they would have added a bunch of cute animals that 
  would substitute for comic relief. In its visually beautiful opening 
  scene, baby Moses is set in a basket and pushed out to sea by his 
  mother, in order to save him from murderous Egyptian soldiers who have 
  taken over their village. Soon, Moses washes up from the sea and is 
  given a home at the palace of the Pharaoh Seti (Patrick Stewart), where 
  he grows up thinking that the Pharaoh is his real father and Pharaoh's 
  son, Rameses (Ralph Fiennes), is his brother. When Moses (voiced well by 
  Val Kilmer) accidentally runs into two slaves, who happen to be his 
  brother, Aaron (Jeff Goldblum), and sister, Miriam, (Sandra Bullock), 
  they try to convince him of his true family. He, at first, doesn't 
  believe them, and then when the truth is reinforced by Pharaoh, Moses 
  becomes outraged that he has been lied to all his life, and realizes 
  that the slaves working at the palace are being severely mistreated. 
  Seekng solace across the desert in a Midianite village, Moses falls in 
  love with the shepardess, Tzipporah (Michelle Pfeiffer), and when he 
  finally comes into contact with the burning bush, which gives him the 
  power to set the slaves free in Egypt, he returns to his home of royalty 
  and sets forth a series of dangerous plagues, which include a 
  destructive swarm of locusts and turning the sea into blood.
  As you have probably guessed, "The Prince of Egypt," is most likely too 
  intense and "adult" for younger children, but it is a magnificent marvel 
  for older children and grown-ups, and it also serves as being 
  educational without becoming relentlessly preachy and religious. Not 
  only that, but the film was so stunning to look at and so sound in its 
  story department that it was actually highly entertaining and exciting, 
  as well.
  With "The Prince of Egypt," animation has certainly gone to a new 
  ultimate level. In recent years, the Disney films had grown to feel 
  unspectacular because the animation simply didn't seem to be showing me 
  things I hadn't already seen. "The Prince of Egypt" contains, by far, 
  the best animation I have ever seen, with a resplendent or astonishing 
  image coming ever minute. The sequences that stand out most in my mind 
  include when hieroglyphics come to life; the plague arrives that kills 
  all of the first-born children; the amazing swarm of locusts; the 
  edge-of-your-seat chariot race; the solemn march of the slaves after 
  they have been freed; and, ultimately, the parting of the red sea. 
  For once, the musical numbers in "The Prince of Egypt" are actually 
  memorable and often quite beautiful, particularly the opening musical 
  number, and "When You Believe," which is a lovely and touching ballad. 
  Although the music is not necessary, the songs were, overall, satisfying 
  enough that I have no objections to the decision of making the film a 
  musical.
  "The Prince of Egypt," finally broke the recent string of disappointing 
  animated features, so much so that this is actually one of the very best 
  films of the year. It showed me images that I had never seen before in 
  the world of animation, and I was constantly in a state of shock and 
  wonder over the astounding technological advancements. Gratefully, the 
  film proves that an animated film can be made that deals with a serious 
  subject without condescending to the so-called "cute and cuddly" laws of 
  children's fare. "The Prince of Egypt" is a towering achievement that 
  puts to shame the majority of recent Disney films, and is an ideal film 
  to see during the holiday season. 

Author
David Sunga
Directed by: Brenda Chapman, Steve Hickner, and Simon Wells
Adapted from the biblical tale in the book of Exodus.
Ingredients: Two brothers, ancient Egypt, Hebrew people escaping slavery
Starring: The voices of Val Kilmer, Ralph Fiennes, Sandra Bullock, Danny
Glover, Jeff Goldblum, Steve Martin, Helen Mirren, Michelle Pfeiffer,
Martin Short, and Patrick Stewart
Synopsis:
The problem begins when a dominant Egyptian culture enslaves members of
a regional Hebrew immigrant minority as a labor force for public works.
Moses (Val Kilmer), born a Hebrew, is adopted and educated among the
affluent, advanced society of Egypt, the reigning superpower of its
time. After accidentally slaying an Egyptian, Moses returns to the
Hebrews and becomes the founder of a divine anti-slavery movement. A
strategy of deliberate collateral casualties - - through divine
biological warfare (plagues) - - is used to leverage superpower
compliance with the demands for autonomy.
Moses is deeply disturbed because his abolitionist beliefs put him at
odds with his beloved brother Ramses (Ralph Fiennes). When an
opportunity arises for the Egyptian military to retaliate, the two
clashing ethnic groups - - one led by Moses and the opposing group led
by his brother - - meet at the Sea of Reeds for a final showdown.
Opinion:
Despite being a cartoon adapted from a 1500 BC story, the themes of THE
PRINCE OF EGYPT- - an affluent dominant society in terror; collateral
damage to leverage political goals; religious fundamentalist movements;
rejection of superpower culture; families torn apart by issues, and;
mysterious biological warfare - - are relevant, 20th Century dilemmas.
Of the 10 Plagues of Egypt, three are periodic natural disasters (hail,
desert locusts, sandstorms, fire, darkness and tidal waves possibly from
the 1500 BC Santorini volcanic eruption), and the other seven can be
duplicated through dinoflagellates, microbes, germ-carrying insects, and
introducing mycotoxin-producing fungus to food supplies stored in silos
and granaries to create poisoning levels strong enough to kill small
"firstborn" children housed in unmarked areas served by those supplies.
Fortunately for modern times, a strategy of deliberately inflicting
collateral casualties is considered militarily unethical, and most
modern nations have ratified the 1972 Biological and Toxin Weapons
Convention (BWC) which bans attacking populations with biblical-style
plagues and toxins.
The child-friendly THE PRINCE OF EGYPT is an animated musical that is
mostly about hope and emancipation, along with an interesting new angle
to the familiar tale. Its main dramatic emphasis is on the inner
reluctance Moses feels when his love for his Egyptian royal brother
comes into conflict with his brother's advocacy of morally untenable
slavery. Aside from being a family film, THE PRINCE OF EGYPT is also a
musical event of sorts. In addition to the soundtrack album, two
simultaneous spinoff  CD's are being released: THE PRINCE OF EGYPT -
NASHVILLE, and THE PRINCE OF EGYPT - INSPIRATIONAL.
There are two minor weaknesses to the film: the sound effects, and the
characterization of Moses. Regarding sound, scenes where legions of
frogs erupt out of the water, or where the Reed Sea comes crashing down
upon the Egyptian army have the potential to fill the theater with a
dramatic, living cacophony, but these opportunities go relatively
silent. As for Moses, the character starts out with vitality in the
beginning of the story. But towards the end - - just when he should be
supercharged with passion, faith, leadership, and conviction - - Moses
seems a hesitant, reluctant emissary, relying on his sister Miriam for
moral support.
On the other hand, THE PRINCE OF EGYPT has many strengths. It includes a
beautiful musical score with excellent tunes. Secondly, the voices are
done well. These days animation, which is advancing by technological
leaps and bounds and becoming more popular, often makes better acting
than real life because it is able to free actors and actresses from
burdensome stereotypes created when the audience can see their
appearance. Finally, THE PRINCE OF EGYPT is visually impressive in that
it integrates topnotch cartooning with computer generated effects to
produce a seamless and extraordinary story universe. The parting of the
Reed Sea is particularly impressive.
Copyright Š 1998 by David Sunga
This review and others like it can be found at
THE CRITIC ZOO: http://www.criticzoo.com
email: zookeeper@criticzoo.com

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten, Ph.D.
 DreamWorks Pictures
 Director:  Brenda Chapman, Steve Hickner, Simon Wells
 Writer:  Philip LaZebnik
 Cast: Voices of Val Kilmer, Sandra Bullock, Ralph Fiennes,
Danny Glover, Jeff Goldblum, Steve Martin, Helen Mirren,
Michelle Pfeiffer, Patrick Stewart
   Perhaps the most dramatic story in all of the Bible is found
in Exodos, what with plagues and bugs, pestilence and
floods, a burning bush, and a snake emerging from a rod. 
There's the parting of the Red Sea, the blood clot of the Nile,
the voice of the Creator (not to be confused with "The
Truman Show") and, golly, after all this, who could doubt that
a man could walk on water?  Only a major film studio could
one-up all this, and which company (save Disney) could do
the job better than DreamWorks, whose contribution so far
this year must give many a kid second thoughts before
stepping on a hill of ants?  DreamWorks goes the Creator a
few steps further.  Not only do the hundreds of people who
had been involved with the construction of "The Lion King"
duplicate the vast miracles of the Old Testament's second
book: they have the Egyptian hieroglyphics, already one of
the world's marvels, come to life and bounce around while
the animators pay homage to the ancient protocol of keeping
the figures sideways.
   With a bevy of original songs penned by Stephen
Schwartz--who avoids the Andrew Lloyd Webber conventions
to inject faintly Hebraic melodies--the cast of thousands act
out the themes of the lyrics: everything from the suffering of
the slaves to the prejudices of one people toward another,
without ignoring the heroics of the title character who trusts in
God though faced with possible death.  These themes give
the film its contemporary relevance, but of course a
correspondence between art and life is only the beginning of
what makes a grand movie.  "The Prince of Egypt" is
imposing because it pushes the animation into a whole new
look, one which deals credibly and even thrillingly
with human beings engaged in an epic struggle without the
crutch of cute animals by their side and nary a trace of
extraneous and contrived comic relief. 
   The voices of major performers in the U.S. and Britain are
so robust and convincing that we wish only that they could
make a regular movie with the force of this eloquent
animation.  The story of Exodus is embellished by dramatic
effect but, as the filmmakers state, the emotional truths are
retained.  
   In a widescreen shot that borrows from the Great Man
Cecil B. DeMille himself, downtrodden slaves are constructing
the pyramids under the whips of the Pharoah's overseers. 
How that ancient civilization was able to build such structures
is not as mystifying as we thought, given the thousands
toiling away, dragging stones and hauling them to huge
heights, the skyscrapers of their day.  Because Egyptians
were killing Hebrew infants, Moses (Val Kilmer) is floated
down the Nile in a covered basket, rescued by the Egyptian
queen (Helen Mirren) and promised safe haven, where he is
raised as though he were the brother of the crown prince,
Rameses (Ralph Fiennes).  The adolescent friendship
between Rameses and Moses--who had every reason to
believe he was a member of the royal Egyptian family--should
please many a teen today.  Then as now the young men got
their kicks from risky adventures: in Moses' day the two
"brothers" raced around town in chariots, not shying away
from bumping each other like the drivers of the scooter cars
in Coney Island.  
   Moses ultimately learns from his real brother Aaron (Jeff
Goldblum) and sister Miriam (Sandra Bullock) that he is one
of the Hebrew people and not, as he had thought, an
Egyptian prince.  Doubting and resisting, Moses is convinced
upon hearing the voice from the Burning Bush, "I am that I
am, the God of your fathers."
   When Moses agrees to chuck his regal prerogatives and
fight for his people, all hell breaks loose on the Egyptians. 
Rameses, who has now become Pharaoh, soon tires of his
"brother"'s pleas to free the Hebrew slaves, but when he
refuses to let the oppressed people go, his kingdom turns
into a modern Baghdad of woes, only far worse.  And here is
where the animators are turned loose.  In a series of
vehement and bloody scenes, some worthy of a Stephen
King drama worked over by John Carpenter, a foggy
presence seeps through the homes of all Egyptians, killing
the first-born in each case while passing over the homes of
the Hebrews (which have been marked by the blood of a
lamb).  Bugs crawl out of bread, ants cover the bodies of the
overlords, fire drizzles from the heavens, and large insects
descend like locusts from "The Good Earth."  As Pharoah--
whose promises are as reliable as Saddam's--permits the
Hebrews to leave, his soldiers attack.  Moses and his
followers sweep across the Red Sea, which has parted
miraculously and which closes upon the armies of the
Egyptian soldiers.  Safely on shore, Moses ultimately
receives the 10 Commandments and is shown holding the
tablet aloft as thousands of his grateful adherents gaze in
wonder.
   If the makers of this extraordinary film have you seeing the
Bible's most dramatic story through fresh eyes, credit the
vision of the DreamWorks team.  Eschewing the literal and
using the story as a jumping off point, they have turned an
already moving and universal written tale into cinematic
poetry.
   Just before the film began, the theater showed what is the
most creative little histories of film, using muppets to explain
the century's old story of celluloid from the beginning.  First
there was neither sound nor visuals--not very exciting.  Then
came visuals but no sound. Soon microphones were added
and we entered the world of talkies, followed by color, wide-
screen and special effects.  What they might have added was
that "The Prince of Egypt" is another historic breakdown, not
as momentous a jump as the others, but nonetheless the first
time an exciting, full-length animation utilizing both computer
techniques and traditional procedures gloriously transcends
the boundary between youthful fare and adult entertainment.

Author
Michael Dequina
_The_Prince_of_Egypt_ (PG) **** (out of ****)
"It's unlike anything you've seen before"--words that have been intoned
many times by many a studio chief trying to wrap a veneer of freshness
around another stale assembly-line product.  But coming from Jeffrey
Katzenberg, the "K" in DreamWorks SKG, in reference to the company's first
traditional animated feature, _The_Prince_of_Egypt_, the statement is,
well, gospel.  _Prince_ is unlike any animated feature ever made, a musical
drama that just _happens_ to be completely drawn.  It's epic in every sense
of the word, from subject, spectacle, sentiment, and, most of all,
seriousness--and, as such, I have no idea how it will be received by the
public.
_Prince_'s larger-than-animated-life intentions are clearly--and most
memorably--spelled out by directors Brenda Chapman, Steve Hickner, and
Simon Wells in the prologue.  "Deliver us to the promised land," pray the
Hebrews held in bondage by the Egyptian pharaoh Seti (voice of Patrick
Stewart) as Yocheved (Ofra Haza) sets her infant son Moses adrift on a
river in an attempt to spare him the life of a slave--and possibly free his
people in the future.  Moses is rescued from the sea by the Queen (spoken
by Helen Mirren, sung by Linda Dee Shayne), who takes Moses in as her own.
This sequence is truly astonishing, from the visuals to the haunting song
that scores it, "Deliver Us," composed by Stephen Schwartz.
The opening is just one in a long line of spectacular sequences in this
treatment of the Book of Exodus, in which Moses's (spoken as an adult by a
full-voiced Val Kilmer, sung by Amick Byram) bond with adoptive brother and
eventual pharaoh Rameses (Ralph Fiennes, well-cast) is broken after he
discovers his true identity--and calling--and crusades for his people's
freedom.  The animators exploit all that the medium currently offers and
then elevate it to the next level: a harrowing nightmare scene is made even
more chilling by being told in pantomime through hieroglyhics; and
computer-generated effects are effectively, and unobtrusively, used to
enhance such crucial scenes as Moses's encounter with the burning bush, the
deaths of the firstborns, and the dazzling parting of the Red Sea.
Artistically speaking in the literal sense, _Prince_ is easily the most
impressive animated feature ever made.
But there's more to the film than awesome visuals, which would be empty
without an absorbing story and characters.  _Prince_ has both, regardless
of the viewer's religious beliefs; the themes of brotherhood, freedom, and
faith (in oneself) are universal, and they resonate strongest in the film's
quieter scenes.  In fact, these quieter scenes hold the most lasting
impact: simple moments like Moses feeling the desert sand blow over his
entire body, or, my personal favorite, the song number "When You Believe,"
which is currently out as an overblown pop single performed by Whitney
Houston and Mariah Carey.  The film version, sung to Moses by his sister
Miriam (spoken by Sandra Bullock, sung by Sally Dworsky) and wife Tzipporah
(spoken _and_ sung by Michelle Pfeiffer, in fine vocal form) is beautiful
and transcendent, building a muted yet no less powerful crescendo of
complex emotion; in the pop version, any and all emotion is lost under all
the diva bluster.
Schwartz, a veteran lyricist for Disney animated efforts (the two most
underrated, _Pocahontas_ and _The_Hunchback_of_Notre_Dame_), also writes
the melodies here, and his song score is not without a couple of missteps.
"Playing with the Big Boys," sung by Rameses's court magicians Hotep (Steve
Martin) and Huy (Martin Short) is a throwaway, and the just-OK "Through
Heaven's Eyes," sung by Tzipporah's father Jethro (spoken by Danny Glover,
sung by Brian Stokes Mitchell), is redeemed by the dramatic importance of
the scene it accompanies.  By and large, Schwartz does a more than adequate
job, exemplified by his two standout compositions, the aforementioned
"Deliver Us" and "When You Believe."  However, Schwartz's work comes close
to being overshadowed by Hans Zimmer's towering score, which is sure to win
an Oscar nomination.
As superlative as _The_Prince_of_Egypt_ is, in all likelihood, it will not
receive its just due from the moviegoing masses weaned on the
tried-and-true Disney animated recipe of singing animals and easy comic
relief; there is neither here, and the religious themes will undoubtedly
keep many away.  And that is a shame, for not only _Prince_ is a landmark
cinematic achievement, the entire fate of its medium is dependent on its
financial success.  Robust box office would not only pose a long-overdue
animation threat to Disney, but it would also erase the medium's "kids'
movie" stigma, allowing filmmakers to explore the medium's heretofore
untapped potential through more complex, serious, and adult themes.  But,
as the film's signature song goes, "There can be miracles when you
believe"--a statement that does hold some water in the fickle movie
marketplace. 
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@iname.com   |  michael_jordan@geocities.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site: http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CompuServe Hollywood Hotline: http://www.HollywoodHotline.com

Author
Alex Ioshpe
WINNER OF 4 GOLDEN APOLLO AWARD
INCLUDING BEST PICTURE - ANIMATED/MIXED AND BEST SCORE
MPAA: Rated PG for intense depiction of thematic elements.
Runtime: USA:97 / Germany:99 / Japan:99 / Netherlands:90
Country: USA
Language: English
Color: Color
Sound Mix: DTS / Dolby Digital / SDDS
Certification: USA:PG / UK:PG / France:U /
Germany:6 / Italy:T / Netherlands:AL (Meekijken Gewenst) / New Zealand:G /
Norway:7 / Portugal:M/6 / Singapore:PG / Sweden:7 /
Switzerland:7 (canton of Geneva) / Switzerland:7 (canton of Vaud) /
Brazil:Livre / Finland:K-8/5
DreamWorks has struck gold with their first animated feature, "The Prince of
Egypt". It's a completely unexpected triumph that will undoubtedly open new
doors and new possibilities in animation. A daring, breathtaking, dramatic
and powerful musical masterpiece and an artful, mature alternative to
Disney. An emotional and visually stunning tour de force that lifts the art
of animation to new hights. This could be the greatest animated feature ever
created. Although it is still magical and entertaining (without being
ashamed of it), it has a premise that is more interesting and serious that
we're used to. It's an artful alternative to Disney's various mermaids,
lions, beauties and beasts. It is simply a more sophisticated subject.
The film opens with a pray, a cry for freedom. The giant Sphinx standing
amidst the vast, dreamy landscape and the sea of Hebrew slaves working under
the burning sun. Egyptian soldiers with swords, bloodied with children's
blood are roaming the Jewish settlement. Amidst this blood, cry and madness,
a Hebrew mother, places her infant son in a basket and sets him adrift on
the Nile River. The burning houses and screams of terror slowly fade away as
the basket disappears in the river. After a perilous journey, the basket
floats near the royal palace, where it is spotted by the Queen. As she
approaches the basket with her young son nearby, she marvels at the
beautiful infant boy inside. She names the baby Moses and adopts him as her
own...
This is an emotional adaptation of the Exodus, resembling a stimulating
drama, rather than a kiddy cartoon. Every effort is made to stress that
Moses is a major figure in the Old and New Testaments and the Koran. It
tells the story of the Hebrew slave Moses, that became one of the greatest
profets of our time. Raised with a rambunctious adopted brother Rameses
(Ralph Fiennes), Moses (Val Kilmer) lives and content life, among the
Egyptian royalty. As teens the young princes are full of vinegar, charging
at breakneck speeds in their chariots, while all around them the Hebrew
slaves do endless toil under the ruthless Pharaoh Seti (Patric Stewart).
Raised to believe they're brothers, they continue to have a strong
connection even after God's will sets them on a collision course. With time
Moses starts to discover the dark side to this paradise. Rameses is
appointed regent and honors Moses with a Jewish slave as a concubine -- a
wild beauty named Tzipporah (Michelle Pfeiffer ). That night as Moses
returns to his room, he discovers that Tzipporah has escaped. Intrigued by
the rebellious girl, he follows her through the Hebrew settlement of Goshen
where he comes upon his true siblings, Miriam (Sandra Bullock) and Aaron
(Jeff Coldblum ). Believing that Moses has returned to help them, Miriam
reveals to Moses the truth about his identity, that he is the son of a
Hebrew slave. Shocked and dismayed, Moses refuses to believe her and flees
back to the palace. That night he has a nightmare about the slaughter of the
newborn Hebrews many years ago. Confused, shocked and angry, he realizes
that his entire life has been a lie. Fleeing to the desert to sort out his
feelings about his true identity, Moses ends up in Midiante, a peaceful
village surrounded by majestic mountains. Here, away from the glamour and
his past existence, he finds another life. A life of peace and harmony. Here
he encounters Tzipporah and her family. Jethro, Tzipporah's father (Danny
Glover) and the High Priest of Midian, welcomes him into their tribe. As the
years pass, Moses and Tzipporah fall in love and build a contented life as
humble shepherds. One day as Moses goes in search of a wayward sheep, he
comes across an unearthly sight -- a burning bush that is not consumed by
the flames. To Moses' amazement, he hears the voice of God (also Val
Kilmer ), revealing his destiny and calling upon him to return to Egypt and
free the Hebrew people. Filled with doubt and fear, but ready to obey his
God, Moses returns to his past home, where he discovers that with the
passing of years the Pharaoh Seti has died and Rameses has become Pharaoh.
This means that he'll have to fight against his former sibling in his quest
to free his people..
This is hugely impressive. If DreamWorks can maintain such high standards,
Disney can say goodbye to its virtual monopoly on high-quality cartoon
features. It is no longer just kiddy animation films, where unwilling
parents has to be dragged along. It is simply another expression. This is no
longer a cartoon, but a work of art. The filmmakers have departed from the
animation formula that's practically been carved on stone tablets by Disney,
removing the kiddy elements, but keeping the same grandiose theatrical
musical style as those Disney epics that have made their way to Broadway.
Disney would never have undertaken such tricky and risky ride. This is not a
fairy tale. It is a story that has its roots in Jewish, Christian and
Islamic religion and believes. The result is nothing less than astounding.
It overshadows De Mille's classic "The Ten Commandments" with its emotions,
unusual depth and power and some of the spectacular action scenes and
chariot races, with its flurry of wheels, horses and rickety wood, almost
leaves "Ben Hur" in its dust. "The Prince of Egypt" has several scenes of
violence, including the scenes of Egyptian cruelty, that although are not
gory or extreme, might seem a bit too realistic for small children. The
directors have concentrated on the character of Moses and recreated him as a
person, not a hero. The thing I liked mostly about the premise of "Prince of
Egypt" is its three dimensionality. Nothing is black and white. There are no
good guys, bad guys or amusing clowns. It is a personal, penetrating drama,
portraying the struggle of Moses with his adopted Egyptian royal family.
Starting with a playful chariot race between Moses and Rameses and ending
with their conflict at the Red Sea, the film depicts once-loving brothers at
odds.
When it comes to animation, there are not enough words to describe the
splendor and complexion of these artists' work. "The Prince of Egypt" is
probably the most beautiful animated film ever made. It stuns the viewer
with its grandness, beauty and power. Drama is written over the entire film.
The grandness and majesty of the ancient Egypt is brought to life like never
before: giant statuary, pyramids and temples adorned with intricate,
colorful hieroglyphics. This kind of visuals are completely impossible to
create on set, in live-action films. The filmmakers seamlessly combine
painting and computer graphics, filling the screen with dense, richly
layered animation. In one particularly inventive dream sequence, even the
hieroglyphics come to life. God was heavily into special effects - when
Moses returns to free his people, he brings along a rod that turns into a
snake, that turns the Nile into blood, brings on all manner of plagues and
pestilence, and, for the big finish, parts the Red Sea. The lustrous colors
and loving care given to the faces are especially noteworthy. The
traditional animation ratio of forehead to eyes, nose and mouth has been
altered slightly to give the characters more room for subtle physical
communication. The change allows Moses to deliver a number of smoldering
glances that are pretty expressive for a 2D man. The music is also
incredible. Hans Zimmer's grand, emotional musical score echoing in the
background, and several wonderful songs (including the philosophical croon
"Through Heaven's Eyes" and the magnificent "When You Believe", preformed by
Whitney Houston and Mariah Carey), create an atmosphere that is
indescribable and is to see nowhere else.
"The Prince of Egypt" breaks away from the ancient traditions of animation,
by exploring new territories. It is a fabulous and magical refreshment from
Disney's cliché-ridden cartoons. This film raises several philosophical
questions, that De Mille never touched. It tells the story of a man that was
the only one that could speak directly to God and become his messenger -- an
honor he didn't ask for and didn't want. To be the chosen one doesn't have
to be a blessing. "The Prince of Egypt" is a celebration of the human
spirit, retelling the undying story of a man that caused a miraculous
victory that would lay a foundation for the birth of a new nation. And yet
it is a personal tragedy -- a life broken by destiny. Moses' life is forever
changed. He had to see hundreds of innocent children die and his own brother
parish. It is a beautiful and dramatic tale about finding yourself, about
life, fate and destiny.

Author
Sridhar Prasad
THE PRINCE OF EGYPT
A film by Brenda Chapman, Steve Hickner, and Simon Wells
With the voices of Val Kilmer, Ralph Fiennes, Michelle Pfeiffer, Helen 
Mirren, Sandra Bullock, Jeff Goldblum, Danny Glover, Steve Martin, 
Martin Short, and Patrick Stewart
    THE PRINCE OF EGYPT, the long-awaited foray by Dreamworks Animation 
(and its head, Jeffrey Katzenberg), is an ambitious, enthralling epic 
whose faults don't undermine the power of the film.  Despite its 
mediocre songs and its rushed story, THE PRINCE OF EGYPT has much to 
recommend, and is an overpowering addition to the animated genre.  
The story is relatively simple.  During the Egyptians' killing of 
all newborn children, a young child is sent down a river, in hopes that 
he will find a home that will care for him.  The young child grows into 
a man, Moses (Kilmer), and together with his brother Ramses (Ralph 
Fiennes), is quite a palace troublemaker, until lhe sees two people who 
remind him of his past.  From that moment, Moses leaves the palace, and 
goes to find his true self.  On the way to that, he finds a little more 
than that: a burning bush, and the voice of God himself.  Moses is given 
a mission: to free the Hebrew slaves from the grasp of the Egyptians.
The story is developed rather a little too quickly.  This film, more 
than any other, deserved the full movie treatment of animation.  I found 
myself asking why didn't Jeffrey Katzenberg take animation to the next 
level by making his movie 2 hours long?  It would have been a better, 
more complete story.  Instead, the miracles of God are rushed into a 
compact 20 minutes.  I found myself looking at my watch midway through, 
wondering when the Red Sea was ever going to be parted.  The first half 
is quite good.  The chariot race sequence between Ramses and Moses is 
excellent, and the animation throughout the entire movie is top-notch.  
It is certainly a gorgeous movie to look at.
The voices are superb, but the only two that register are the two 
that matter.  Kilmer and Fiennes are great, as are Goldblum, Bullock, 
and Pfeiffer.  The relationship between Kilmer and Fiennes is essential, 
however.  It has to work for the film to work, and the development is 
exquisite.  The film adds the guilt on Moses as Ramses' son dies.  Moses 
knows he had to go through his ordeals, but he sees his brother suffer, 
and it is difficult to watch.  It is a great moment in animation.  There 
are in fact many of those moments, the best probably being the burning 
bush, which is a great piece of work.
The score is actually pretty good, although the songs are pretty 
mediocre.  The first song, "Deliver Us",wasn't too bad, and neither was 
the second, "River Flow Gently".  Much of the latter half of the film, 
beginning with Moses' departure from Egypt, is told in episodic fashion, 
like Martin Scorsese's KUNDUN, in the sense that songs are merely 
episodes, and the movie moves from episode to episode, in almost blocks 
of 5 minutes, telling the story by visuals instead of dialogue.  It 
works for the most part, although some of the songs don't.  The big 
number by Martin and Short is a failure, mostly because it feels like 
something out of ALADDIN.  The song sung by Danny Glover's character, 
and Moses' future father-in-law is also something that didn't exactly 
sit well with me, although the sequence was very well done.  Come the 
last, rushed third of the film, there are merely glimpses of things I 
wanted to see more.  All of God's plagues are told in one 4 minute 
sequence, the plague of the frogs and locusts.  These were truly 
frightening and scary.  Yet, it felt rushed.  I wanted more of this, I 
wanted more of this terror, because that was what God was inflicting 
upon the Egyptians, and Pharoah himself.  Certainly, visual wise they 
were exquisite, but if more had been available, the film would have been 
even more devastating as far as impact.
Certainly, the Red Sea sequence, the Burning Bush, and the sequence 
where God takees all of the Egyptian first born, are all spectacular.  
There is some true uneasiness when God kills so many.  There is a 
strange dichotomy during all of PRINCE OF EGYPT.  On one hand, the film 
wants to extend the borders of animation.  It wants to be so great, that 
it often is.  The terrorizing sequences attest to that fact.  The 
character development between Ramses and Moses (the only two characters 
that are developed) is sensational, and the effects are magnificent.  
This is meant to be a very serious movie, and it delivers at the end.  
But throughout the film, there is a sense of making this one "for the 
kids".  As a result, things like Martin Short's and Steve Martin's 
characters, their ridiculous production number, some of the songs, and 
MIchelle Pfeiffer's character (who looks a little too much like Disney's 
POCAHONTAS), are really annoying, and angered me deeply. If Dreamworks 
had stuck to its guns instead of competing with Disney, they could have 
made the greatest animated film of all time.  Add about 1/2 hour to an 
hour to it, show what happens to the Hebrews with the Ten Commandments, 
and take out about half the songs, and this is one hell of a movie.  
Still, the mature last half, and the spectacular last 20 minutes make 
this a damn good film.  Dreamworks could have done more, but what they 
did was pretty good itself. 

Author
Victory Marasigan
NOTE: This review and an interview with Dreamworks SKG's Jeffrey
Katzenberg and the makers THE PRINCE OF EGYPT can be found at: 
http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~vmaras1/reviewsidx.html
The concept for DreamWorks SKG's _The Prince of Egypt_ doesn't
sound like subject matter ripe for the animated-movie treatment. The film
retells the Biblical story of Exodus, the same one told in DeMille's
expansive epic _The Ten Commandments_. A "cartoon" about plague and
pestilence, infant murders, and the drowning of hundreds of soldiers? Is
DreamWorks crazy?
Such reservations can thankfully be put to rest, because the resulting
film is one of the most touching and emotionally uplifting versions of the
story yet depicted. DreamWork's version of this oft-told tale offers a
vulnerable Moses, as compared to Charlton Heston's famous
chiseled-out-of-stone take on the character.  Gaunt and rather
unintimidating, this Moses (voiced by Val Kilmer) has the rebellious
demeanor and zeal that any young soul might have. 
The film's bold, sweeping opening sequence (underscored by the wondrous
choral cry "Deliver Us") shows us Moses' legendary beginnings, as his
desperate mother sends him adrift on the Nile to escape the Pharaoh's
(Patrick Stewart)  murderous soldiers. Ironically, this action brings the
Hebrew infant into the care of the Pharaoh's family. Raised like the
Pharaoh's own, Moses grows up unaware of his true heritage. He develops a
strong bond with the Pharaoh's son Rameses (Ralph Fiennes, in the most
convincing and heartbreaking of the film's characterizations). Moses' life
is turned on its end when, soon after being declared prince, he meets his
true siblings (voiced by Sandra Bullock and Jeff Goldblum), who reveal to
him his slave heritage. This truth is too much for the young man; without
explanation, he leaves his father's kingdom behind, unsure of his destiny. 
For the animators, envisioning a story set in ancient Egypt seems to have
been like discovering a treasure-filled mummy's tomb. The majestic
Egyptian city, with its oversize temples and skyscraping statues, looks
like an elaborate chessboard, with pieces which may have been laid there
by the hands of the Gods themselves. The rich color in the temples'
hypostyle halls, the painted limestone reliefs, the glare of the
unforgiving sunlight -- all details which pull us into the reality of that
beautiful place. 
Moses' journey eventually brings him into contact with God Himself, who
empowers him to return to his kingdom and let his people go. The miracles
Moses helps bring about, from the invasion of swarms of insects to the
fiery finger of God, dazzle with a beauty which is believable without
being photorealistic. And let's not forget _the_ miracle -- the parting of
the Red Sea -- which features astounding, breathtaking visual effects. 
Though Moses finds love and marriage in the desert, the film is really
more interested in the relationship between him and Rameses. The latter
experiences a tragic fall due to his own blindness, but his caring for his
brother remains solid throughout the film. And so, Rameses becomes one of
the most sympathizable "bad guys"  ever to be depicted in an animated
movie. 
So who is the audience for this film? The way the story is told, a person
need not be familiar with nor even believe in the Biblical stories to be
moved by it. Younger children can sit through the film and not be fully
aware of the scope of the horrors being inferred. Inspiring and
transporting, _The Prince of Egypt_ is an experience believers and
non-believers alike should not miss.

Author
Susan Granger
Set in ancient Egypt, this animated tale follows the Biblical
story of Exodus in which Moses grew from slave to prince and led his
people to the promised land, progressing from hedonistic unawareness
to an acceptance of faith and responsibility as God's chosen leader of
the Jewish people. It's a loose adaptation, capturing the "essence and
values" of the Bible story. Scholars may quibble with the fact that
Moses is rescued by Pharaoh's wife (Helen Mirren), not daughter but,
despite details which have been changed, the epic holds true as the
baby is set adrift on the Nile by his mother to escape the wrath of
Pharaoh (Patrick Stewart) against the Hebrews. Miraculously, he is
found and raised as a member of the Royal Family. Ignorant of his
heritage, he forms a close bond with Pharaoh's son Ramses (Ralph
Fiennes) yet, the step-brothers are torn apart by fate (think Cain and
Abel) as Moses (Val Kilmer) meets his sister (Sandra Bullock) who
reveals who he is and where he came from. The brothers' teenage
relationship is a DreamWorks invention that works dramatically since,
eventually, Moses must appeal to Ramses to let his oppressed people
go, amidst plague-and-pestilence. DreamWorks' animation is stunning,
never surrendering to "cute" touches that would make it into a
whimsical cartoon for moppets. It's a risky, PG-rated choice that may
lose the pre-school "Antz" audience but should pay off in the long
run, combining "Raiders of the Lost Ark" with "The Ten Commandments."
And the music is magnificent with a score that should dominate Oscar
night. On the Granger Movie Gauge of 1 to 10, "Prince of Egypt" is a
fanciful yet reverent 10, an instant classic that redefines the
animation genre with a new sophistication. One of the best pictures of
the year!

Author
"Average Joe" Barlow
        Even apart from the possible religious controversey,
Dreamworks has taken a serious financial risk with their first
animated release, "The Prince of Egypt."  Not only have they
done the unthinkable (challenge the supremacy of "The Mouse"
in the field of feature-length animation), they've chosen a
topic with the potential to offend as many as it entertains.
There's also the strong possibility that the film's target
audience, children, may not wish to attend a "religious" movie,
which often has the stigma of boredom attached to it, even
when animated.
        But never fear: Dreamworks has created an entertaining
film that can be enjoyed even by those who have little interest
in the Bible.  Setting aside the stoic morality lessons that
religious epics so often attempt to convey, "The Prince of Egypt"
is a fun, fast gallop through the Old Testament's Book of Exodus,
covering the life of Moses beginning with his mother's desperate
attempt to save his life, and culminating with his deliverance of
the Ten Commandments to the Hebrews.  But although the movie's
tone is often light-hearted and comical, it finds a striking
balance with the seriousness and drama that source material of
this nature demands.  It's a delicate high-wire act, but the film
doesn't stumble.
        Moses (voiced by Val Kimer) and Ramses (voiced by Ralph
Finnes, whose career seems to be recovering nicely after "The
Avengers") are sons of the Pharoah Seti (an excellent vocal
performance from Star Trek's Patrick Stewart).  Wild and carefree,
the two boys are the best of friends, in addition to being brothers.
This changes after Moses learns the truth from his sister Miriram
(Sandra Bullock): he is not the true son of the Pharoah after all.
Leaving behind the only life he has ever known, Moses wanders into
the desert and finds contentment and happiness with a band of
gypsies.  Eventually, however, God speaks to him and reveals
Moses's true mission: free the Hebrews from the grip of the
tyranical new Pharoah... who happens to be none other than his
former "brother," Ramses.  This is the stuff of which great
drama is made, and the film wisely concentrates the majority of
its screen-time with the difficult relationship between these two
young men, each uncomfortable with their new animosity... but
both nonetheless unyielding in their beliefs.  The vocal
performances by Kilmer and Finnes are excellent, with each
properly conveying the tone and frustration that each character
possesses.
        Visually, "The Prince of Egypt" is overflowing with
stunning moments and incredible imagery; in fact, I believe that
it contains the highest quality animation I've ever seen in an
American film.  The alternating seriousness and comedy works
very well, each providing an intriguing counterpoint to the other,
yet never detracting from the epic qualities of the story.  (And to
my great delight, Dreamworks didn't feel the need to throw in any
cute, talking animals with a fondness for singing and dancing.)
The influence of Disney is felt in one significant way, however:
musical numbers, and plenty of 'em.  Although they're not bad when
taken on their own, I observed that on a few occasions they greatly
hindered the story's pacing.  A minor flaw, perhaps, but I frequently
found myself waiting for the tunes to end so I could get back to the
actual plotline, which interested me far more.
        "The Prince of Egypt" is nonetheless a cinematic triumph,
offering proof that Disney doesn't have a monopoly on quality
American animation.  Parents should be aware, however, that this
movie is rated "PG," rather than the tamer "G" that most Disney
films receive.  It has a number of intense moments which could
conceivably scare younger members of the family: the
slaughtering of the Egyptian first-borns gave *me* chills, as did
Moses's eerie "hyroglyphics" dream sequence; also, some of the
children at the screening I attended seemed quite frightened by
the sight of Pharoah's hordes descending down upon the Hebrews
at the Red Sea.  You're the best judge of what your kids can
handle, but do be aware that moments of the film are quite livid.
But if you can handle it, you're in a for a treat.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing list.  Or,
you can subscribe directly from my web page.  Thanks.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Author
Steve Rhodes
When casting the key part of the voice of Moses, most people's first
candidate would probably not be the controversial actor Val Kilmer (THE
SAINT and THE ISLAND OF DR.  MOREAU), but he was Dreamworks's choice in
their first traditionally animated movie, THE PRINCE OF EGYPT.
The selection of Kilmer proved to be a wise one, but the biggest risk
Dreamworks took wasn't in the casting department.  The radical departure
was that they decided to use the medium of animation to make a biblical
epic, a la Cecil B. DeMille, to move our hearts and minds rather than to
tickle our funny bones.
In the press kit producer Penney Cox says that they wanted to make a
film for adults based on sophisticated themes but one that did not
exclude children.  Animated movies for adults that are appropriate for
kids and that are not comedies, now that is something fresh.
Let me admit up-front that I was quite skeptical as to whether
Dreamworks could pull it off.  Dreamworks's ANTZ seemed to be a movie
not quite appropriate for any age group.  THE PRINCE OF EGYPT may be
harder to market than ANTZ, but it is much more satisfying.
Like ANTZ and unlike the more modest casting of Pixar's A BUG'S LIFE,
THE PRINCE OF EGPYT has half of Hollywood doing the voices.  Danny
Glover is the voice of Jethro, Jeff Goldblum of Aaron, Steve Martin of
Hotep, Helen Mirren of the Queen, Michelle Pfeiffer of Tzipporah, Martin
Short of Huy and Patrick Stewart of Seti.  You can figure out for
yourself who does the voice of God.
The movie, which is weakest in the story department, is a Cliff's Notes
version of DeMille's THE TEN COMMANDMENTS.  The script by Kelly Asbury
and Lorna Cook has an obsession with touching briefly on every classic
event in Moses's life.  DeMille took over three and a half hours in
order to do it justice.  At less than half of that, THE PRINCE OF EGYPT
rushes through so much material that it doesn't establish sufficient
depth for us to bond with the characters.
We meet Moses when the queen finds him floating in his little basket.
We watch him grow up and become best bud and a chariot racing partner to
Ramses (Ralph Fiennes), the future Pharaoh.  Moses is a free spirit and
a practical joker until he finds out his true identity as a Jew.  ("All
I've ever known to be true is a lie," Moses complains.)  After finding
out his real identity, he sees for the first time the oppression of the
Jewish slaves that are all around him.
After leaving Egypt, Moses comes back to ask Ramses to let Moses's
people go.  This leads to the classic scene of the parting of the Red
Sea, which is one of many places where computers were used to enhance
the traditionally hand-drawn animation of the most of the production.
It is the absolutely stunning visuals that make the movie so compelling.
Drawn with a rich palette of luxurious roses, blues and golds, the
picture looks sumptuous from its first frame to its last.
The construction of the temple is shown in blowing dust, and other
scenes are shot with the glow of a rising sun.  The most original visual
sequence in the film occurs during a dream Moses has.  Done with an
explicit two-dimensional look, the colorful images painted on the temple
walls come to life to tell their own animated story.
Even though it has its weaknesses, THE PRINCE OF EGYPT is a noble
attempt to carve out a new genre -- serious animated movies for adults
that are acceptable for the entire family.  This awe-inspiring movie
deserves to be seen.
THE PRINCE OF EGYPT runs about 1:30.  It is rated PG for thematic
elements and would be fine for the whole family.  How old a kid would
need to be to be interested depends on the child, but those over 8 will
probably like it.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: www.InternetReviews.com

Author
Victory Marasigan
NOTE: This review and an interview with Dreamworks SKG's Jeffrey
Katzenberg and the makers THE PRINCE OF EGYPT can be found at: 
http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~vmaras1/reviewsidx.html
The concept for DreamWorks SKG's _The Prince of Egypt_ doesn't
sound like subject matter ripe for the animated-movie treatment. The film
retells the Biblical story of Exodus, the same one told in DeMille's
expansive epic _The Ten Commandments_. A "cartoon" about plague and
pestilence, infant murders, and the drowning of hundreds of soldiers? Is
DreamWorks crazy?
Such reservations can thankfully be put to rest, because the resulting
film is one of the most touching and emotionally uplifting versions of the
story yet depicted. DreamWork's version of this oft-told tale offers a
vulnerable Moses, as compared to Charlton Heston's famous
chiseled-out-of-stone take on the character.  Gaunt and rather
unintimidating, this Moses (voiced by Val Kilmer) has the rebellious
demeanor and zeal that any young soul might have. 
The film's bold, sweeping opening sequence (underscored by the wondrous
choral cry "Deliver Us") shows us Moses' legendary beginnings, as his
desperate mother sends him adrift on the Nile to escape the Pharaoh's
(Patrick Stewart)  murderous soldiers. Ironically, this action brings the
Hebrew infant into the care of the Pharaoh's family. Raised like the
Pharaoh's own, Moses grows up unaware of his true heritage. He develops a
strong bond with the Pharaoh's son Rameses (Ralph Fiennes, in the most
convincing and heartbreaking of the film's characterizations). Moses' life
is turned on its end when, soon after being declared prince, he meets his
true siblings (voiced by Sandra Bullock and Jeff Goldblum), who reveal to
him his slave heritage. This truth is too much for the young man; without
explanation, he leaves his father's kingdom behind, unsure of his destiny. 
For the animators, envisioning a story set in ancient Egypt seems to have
been like discovering a treasure-filled mummy's tomb. The majestic
Egyptian city, with its oversize temples and skyscraping statues, looks
like an elaborate chessboard, with pieces which may have been laid there
by the hands of the Gods themselves. The rich color in the temples'
hypostyle halls, the painted limestone reliefs, the glare of the
unforgiving sunlight -- all details which pull us into the reality of that
beautiful place. 
Moses' journey eventually brings him into contact with God Himself, who
empowers him to return to his kingdom and let his people go. The miracles
Moses helps bring about, from the invasion of swarms of insects to the
fiery finger of God, dazzle with a beauty which is believable without
being photorealistic. And let's not forget _the_ miracle -- the parting of
the Red Sea -- which features astounding, breathtaking visual effects. 
Though Moses finds love and marriage in the desert, the film is really
more interested in the relationship between him and Rameses. The latter
experiences a tragic fall due to his own blindness, but his caring for his
brother remains solid throughout the film. And so, Rameses becomes one of
the most sympathizable "bad guys"  ever to be depicted in an animated
movie. 
So who is the audience for this film? The way the story is told, a person
need not be familiar with nor even believe in the Biblical stories to be
moved by it. Younger children can sit through the film and not be fully
aware of the scope of the horrors being inferred. Inspiring and
transporting, _The Prince of Egypt_ is an experience believers and
non-believers alike should not miss.
